<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88926-0045 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.9-26-88.f2.A1044</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 186 / Monday, September 26, 1988/ Proposed Rules <ITAG tagnum="52">ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">40 CFR PART 761 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[OPTS-62059; FRL-3396-9] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Polychlorinated Biphenyls; Notification and Manifesting for PCB WasteActivities </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Environmental Protection Agency (EPA).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Proposed rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>EPA is proposing amendments to its disposal and storageregulations for polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs). This document proposesnotification requirements for certain entities who handle PCB waste, requirementsfor certain entities to prepare and carry a manifest for purposes of trackingthe disposal of PCB waste, and requirements that commercial storers ofPCB waste obtain approvals from the EPA Regional Administrators, developclosure plans for their facilities, and demonstrate financial responsibilityfor closure. Also, this notice proposes amendments to the PCB recordkeepingrequirements. These amendments are proposed under section 6(e)(1) of the Toxic SubstancesControl Act (TSCA), 15 U.S.C. 2605(e)(1), which authorizes the EPA Administratorto promulgate rules prescribing methods of disposal for PCBs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>Written comments must be received by October 26, 1988.If persons request time for oral comment, EPA will hold an informal hearingin Washington, DC, on November 9, 1988. The exact time and location ofthe hearing will be made available by telephoning the TSCA Assistance Officeat the telephone number listed under <T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT</T2>. Written requests to participatein the informal hearing must be received by the TSCA Assistance Officeor postmarked no later than October 26, 1988. For additional informationon the hearing and the procedures for filing requests to participate, seeUnit V of this preamble.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Submit written comments, in triplicate, identified bythe document control number OPTS 62059, by mail to: TSCA Public DocketOffice (TS-793), Rm. NE G004, Office of Toxic Substances, EnvironmentalProtection Agency, 401 M St., SW., Washington, DC 20460. Information submitted in any comment concerning this proposed rule maybe claimed confidential by marking any part or all of that informationas ``Confidential Business Information'' (CBI). Information so marked willnot be disclosed except in accordance with procedures set forth in 40 CFRPart 2. A copy of such a comment that does not contain the CBI should besubmitted for inclusion in the public record. Information not marked confidentialwill be disclosed publicly by EPA by placing it in the public record withoutprior notice to the submitter. All written comments will be available forpublic inspection and copying at the TSCA Public Docket Office in Rm. NEG004, at the address given above, from 8 a.m. to 4 p.m., Monday throughFriday, except legal holidays.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2> Michael M. Stahl, Director, TSCAAssistance Office (TS-799), Office of Toxic Substances, Rm. EB-44, EnvironmentalProtection Agency, 401 M St., SW., Washington, DC 20460, (202-554-1404),TDD: (202-554-0557).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>In this document, EPA is proposingamendments to its PCB storage and disposal regulations, which are codifiedin Subpart D, 40 CFR 761.60 <T3>et seq. </T3>The information collection requirements of this proposed rule have beensubmitted for approval to the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) underthe <T3>Paperwork Reduction Act, </T3>44 U.S.C. 3501 <T3>et seq. </T3>An Information Collection Request document has been preparedby EPA (ICR No. 1446) and a copy may be obtained from David DiFiore, InformationPolicy Branch (PM-223), Environmental Protection Agency, 401 M St., SW.,Washington, DC. 20460. A copy may also be obtained by calling (202) 382-2744.The public reporting burden for this collection of information is estimatedto average 1.5 hours per response for the notification requirements, 3hours per response for the Exception and Discrepancy Reporting requirements,and 325 to 460 hours per response for the financial assurance and closurerequirements. These estimates include time for reviewing instructions,searching existing data sources, gathering and maintaining the needed data,and completing and reviewing the collection of information. Comments regarding the burden estimate or any other aspect of this collectionof information, including suggestions for reducing this burden, shouldbe submitted to the Chief, Information Policy Branch (PM-223), EnvironmentalProtection Agency, 401 M St., SW., Washington, DC 20460. These commentsshould also be submitted to the Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs,Office of Management and Budget, Washington, DC 20503, marked ATTENTION:Desk Officer for EPA. The final rule will respond to any OMB or publiccomments on the information collection requirements contained in this proposal.<ITAG tagnum="84">I. Overview of This Proposed Rulemaking </ITAG>EPA regulates the disposal and storage for disposal of PCBs under its TSCAsection 6(e)(1) authority, rather than its authority to regulate the managementof hazardous waste under Subtitle C of the Resource Conservation and RecoveryAct (RCRA), unless the PCB waste also meets the definition of RCRA hazardouswaste. EPA has identified several areas where improvements are needed inits TSCA program for PCB wastes, and these improvements require the promulgationof additional disposal and storage requirements. EPA has concluded thatthe most pressing of the needed program improvements are the addition ofan effective tracking system for PCB wastes and the addition of an approvalmechanism for the commercial storers who act as intermediate storers ofPCB wastes prior to their disposal. This notice proposes to add to the PCB disposal requirements a trackingsystem for PCB wastes akin to the ``cradle-to-grave'' tracking system forhazardous wastes which EPA promulgated under RCRA Subtitle C. The proposalincludes a requirement that certain entities among those who handle (generate,transport, store, or dispose) regulated PCB wastes must notify EPA of theirPCB-waste activities, so that the Agency may obtain basic information aboutthe nature, location, and extent of these activities. The proposal furtherrequires that each such entity notifying EPA obtain from the Agency a uniqueidentification number which will identify that entity in the shipping documents(manifests) and other records and reports that constitute the waste trackingsystem. The proposal also describes the manifest system that will be implementedto track the movement of PCB waste from the point of generation to thepoint of disposal, and it describes the recordkeeping and reporting requirementsthat complete the tracking system.This notice further proposes to add to the PCB storage regulations an approvalmechanism for the commercial storers of PCB wastes. The proposal wouldspecifically require all commercial storers of PCB wastes to prepare closureplans for their facilities, and to demonstrate their financial responsibilityfor the closure of their PCB storage areas. Storers of PCB wastes who cannotdemonstrate compliance with the proposed rule's financial assurance forclosure requirements would be required to cease operations and close theirfacilities. <ITAG tagnum="84">II. Authority </ITAG>This proposed rule is issued pursuant to section 6(e)(1) of TSCA. Section6(e)(1)(A) gives the Administrator the authority to promulgate rules prescribingthe methods for disposal of PCBs. (15 U.S.C. 2605(e)(1)(A)). Furthermore,section 6(e)(1)(B) provides broad authority for EPA to promulgate rulesthat would:<ITAG tagnum="21">* * * (B) require polychlorinated biphenyls to be marked with clearand adequate warnings, and instructions with respect to their processing,distribution in commerce, use, or disposal or with respect to any combinationof such activities.'' 15 U.S.C. 2605(e)(1)(B).</ITAG>Consistent with this authority, EPA proposes to implement a waste trackingsystem for PCB wastes which would consist of shipping documents (manifests)and other records and reports which are described by the section 6(e)(1)language. Tracking requirements are necessary for effective managementof PCB disposal by EPA, and they function as warnings and instructionsto be followed by others in connection with the processing, transport,and disposal of PCB wastes. Therefore, the promulgation of the trackingsystem proposed today for PCB wastes is clearly authorized by the TSCAsection 6(e)(1) language. EPA also regulates the storage of PCB wastes prior to disposal under itsTSCA section 6(e)(1) disposal authority for PCBs. The current requirementsfor PCB storage facilities are codified at 40 CFR 761.65. Therefore, theamendments proposed today to the andSection; 761.65 storage regulations arealso promulgated under section 6(e)(1) of TSCA. <ITAG tagnum="84">III. Background </ITAG>A. Regulatory History TSCA, which became effective on January 1, 1977, includes in section 6(e)specific provisions which demonstrate Congress' intent that commercialactivities involving PCBs be eliminated or restricted. In addition to requiringthe implementation of a disposal program for PCBs (section 6(e)(1)), Congressestablished in sections 6(e)(2) and 6(e)(3) phased prohibitions on thenew manufacture of PCBs, the use of PCBs, the processing of PCBs, and thedistribution in commerce of PCBs. By the terms of the statute, the phase-inof the PCB prohibitions was to begin l year after the Act's effective date.However, the statute also conferred authority upon EPA to authorize certain``non-totally enclosed'' uses of PCBs upon a showing that the uses wouldnot present unreasonable risks of injury to health or the environment.(15 U.S.C. 2605(e)(2)(B)). Similarly, section 6(e)(3)(B) gives EPA authorityto exempt activities from the statutory prohibitions on PCB manufacture,processing, and distribution in commerce. These exemptions, which are effectivefor 1 year if not renewed, require a showing that the activity will notpose an unreasonable risk of injury to health or the environment, and ashowing that good faith efforts have been made to develop substitutes forthe PCBs involved in the activity. (15 U.S.C. 2605(e)(3)(B)). Since the enactment of TSCA, EPA has developed a comprehensive body ofregulations implementing section 6(e). In a final rule issued on May 31,1979 (44 FR 31514), EPA set forth a comprehensive approach to the implementationof the TSCA section 6(e) prohibitions on PCB activities. The May 31, 1979regulation announced many of the core definitions and policies underlyingthe national PCB program. Furthermore, this regulation announced the Agency'sinitial policies and decisions on various requests for use authorizationsand requests for exemptions from the statutory prohibitions on new manufacture,processing, and distribution in commerce. The May 31, 1979 regulation alsoamended and recodified the disposal requirements for PCB wastes, whichEPA had originally issued in a regulation published on February 17, 1978(43 FR 7150). Since the enactment of TSCA in 1976, the disposal requirements for PCBwastes and the disposal requirements for RCRA ``hazardous wastes'' havebeen handled separately. TSCA and RCRA were enacted within several daysof each other in October, 1976, and regulations implementing the RCRA hazardouswaste management system were published on May 19, 1980 (45 FR 33119). BecauseCongress called for the creation of a PCB disposal program under TSCA section6(e)(1) within months of TSCA's effective date, it was necessary for theAgency to initiate the PCB disposal program well before the implementationof the RCRA management system. The existing PCB disposal regulations at 40 CFR 761.60 <T3>et seq., </T3>prescribe specific disposal requirements for definedclasses of PCB wastes. The classes of wastes are defined in terms of thesource, physical state, and PCB concentration of the waste material. ThePCB disposal requirements apply generally to PCB materials that containPCBs at concentrations of 50 parts per million (ppm) or greater. The disposalregulations specify the disposal options available for the various speciesof ``PCBs'' and ``PCB Items,'' as they are defined at 40 CFR 761.3. Themost significant of the disposal requirements are those specified at 40CFR 761.60(a) for PCB liquids (primarily, askarel dielectrics and mineraloil dielectrics) and the requirements specified for ``PCB Articles,'' whichinclude ``PCB Transformers,'' ``PCB Capacitors,'' and ``PCB-ContaminatedElectrical Equipment.'' (40 CFR 761.60(b)). These PCB liquids and PCB Articlesaccount for the preponderance of all the PCBs that have been produced inthe past, and they are the source of much of the PCB waste that is subjectto the TSCA disposal regulations.The PCB disposal regulations generally require that the regulated PCB wastesbe disposed of in high-temperature incinerators that accomplish 99.9999percent PCB destruction, or in alternative disposal processes that accomplishan equivalent level of performance (40 CFR 761.60(a)(1), 761.60(e)). Destructionin approved, high-temperature incinerators is the primary disposal methodfor PCBs, while disposal in approved chemical waste landfills (andSection;761.75) and in alternative processes (alternative thermal, chemical destruction,physical separation, etc.) accounts for the disposition of a relativelysmall proportion of the total PCBs removed from service. The PCB disposal regulations are aided by specific marking requirementsfor PCB Items at 40 CFR 761.40. Also, PCB storage requirements at 40 CFR761.65 impose design, location, and containment requirements for the storagefacilities used to store PCB wastes prior to disposal. The storage requirementsare intended to minimize the potential for releases of stored PCBs to theenvironment, and that potential is further mitigated by the requirementthat limits the storage of regulated PCB wastes to a period not exceedingl year (40 CFR 761.65(a)). Finally, the existing PCB regulations requirethat certain records be kept at facilities which use, store, or disposeof PCBs, and these records must include information documenting the use,transfer, and disposition of specific PCB Items (40 CFR 761.180). B. Generation of PCB Wastes In this proposal, the term generator of PCB waste is defined and used inorder to maintain consistency with the RCRA tracking system for hazardouswastes, which forms the model for much of today's proposal. The generatorconcept is fundamental to the RCRA hazardous waste management system, andthe term has gained such familiarity over the years among those connectedwith waste management, that its use in this proposed rule is virtuallya necessity. However, the term ``generator'' itself nowhere appears inthe current TSCA disposal regulations for PCBs, although the concept ofgenerating waste applies as much to PCB wastes as to any other material.For purposes of this proposal, ``generator of PCB waste'' would be definedas any person whose act or process produces PCBs that are regulated fordisposal under TSCA, or whose act first causes a ``PCB'' or ``PCB Item''to become subject to the Subpart D disposal requirements of 40 CFR Part761. For example, the ``owners'' or ``users'' of the PCB fluids and PCBItems regulated for disposal under TSCA are, or will become, the typicalgenerators of PCB wastes, at such time as they retire their regulated materials(50 ppm or greater) from service. In other circumstances, the term generator connotes broader coverage thanmere owner or user of PCBs or PCB Items. For example, a transporter whocleans up PCBs that spill from a transport vehicle may be a generator ofPCB waste. Likewise, a disposal facility may at times be a generator ofPCB waste, such as when it physically separates PCBs from dielectric fluids,and transports the separated phase (e.g., stillbottoms or sludges) containingPCBs to an approved incinerator for destruction. So, beyond the typicalcase where an owner or user of PCBs removes PCBs or PCB Items from service,PCB waste may also be ``generated'' by those who respond to PCB spills,those who drain PCB fluids from PCB Articles during servicing or disposaloperations, those who process or distribute in commerce PCB wastes in aform other than that previously manifested, and those who remove PCBs fromexisting disposal sites, including disposal sites that pre-date the SubpartD disposal requirements for PCBs. This definition is similar to the RCRA definition of ``generator'' at 40CFR 260.10, but it differs from the RCRA definition in one important respect.In the context of this proposal, the term ``generator of PCB waste'' generallyrefers to the ``person'' (see 40 CFR 761.3) who creates PCB wastes, andnot, as would be the case under RCRA, to the individual sites where particularPCBs or PCB Items were used before they became wastes. Section 761.3 defines ``person'' to include individuals, government entities,corporations, and other business associations, so the effect of the proposeddefinition of ``generator of PCB waste'' generally would be to consolidateall of the PCB waste created by a given ``person'' under one generatoridentification, regardless of the number of sites that ``person'' mightuse, own, or control. The only exception is where another regulation expresslycalls for a site-specific meaning of the term ``generator of PCB waste.''In such a case, the more specific requirement controls. The only site-specificreference to generator proposed here is the requirement that the users,owners, or processors of PCBs or PCB Items who maintain their own andSection;761.65(b) storage facilities for PCBs must submit unique generator notificationsto EPA for each of their PCB storage facilities. In cases where the ``generator''owns or operates storage facilities, each site of storage would be a unique``generator of PCB waste'' for purposes of this regulation. As such, PCBwastes transported from the storage facilities would be manifested fromthe storage sites, and the manifests would reference the storage facilities'unique EPA identification numbers. The proposal to treat users' and owners'storage facilities as unique generators is discussed further in Unit IV.B.2.of this preamble. Otherwise, all PCB waste generated by a given individualor company would be identified with the one consolidated generator. Defining ``generator of PCB waste'' in this manner for TSCA purposes departsfrom the RCRA Subtitle C approach. This distinction is made necessary byattributes of the PCB waste universe that set it apart from the RCRA universe.Under RCRA, the typical generator of hazardous waste is an industrial facilitythat regularly produces waste streams that are fairly predictable fromthe standpoint of both volumes generated and their composition. The generationof these waste streams is a regular occurrence associated with the manufacturingand processing activities engaged in at the specific facilities or sites.In this context, a site-specific definition of ``generator'' is sensible.PCBs, on the other hand, are widely dispersed among millions of ``sites''involving end use of electrical equipment and similar articles. In thiscontext, a site-specific definition of ``generator'' would result in anunwieldy waste tracking system that would be neither workable nor cost-effective.For example, if each site where electrical equipment is used were to betreated as a unique generation site, the utilities could be required tosubmit unique notifications for each of the more than 12 million mineraloil-filled distribution transformers which they own or operate. This resultwould overwhelm both EPA and the regulated community. Requiring uniquenotifications would be inefficient administratively, since significantresource burdens would be associated with issuing for each site a uniqueidentification number, which would be used only one time to track the movementof one item of waste. The consolidated definition of ``generator of PCB waste'' proposed herewill promote greater regulatory efficiency, without the loss of informationthat EPA would find highly useful. For example, under the proposal, the12 million individual distribution transformers would be dispersed among3,320 utility system generators, a far more reasonable and workable resultthan would be accomplished under a site-specific definition based on siteof use. Greater regulatory efficiency is also anticipated for non-utilityentities, such as the non-utility industrial users of PCB Transformersand PCB Capacitors, and those who use PCB Transformers in commercial buildinginstallations. EPA requests specific comments on the extent of consolidation that theproposal will accomplish in terms of defining users or owners of PCBs asgenerators. To what extent will this proposed definition of ``generatorof PCB waste'' reduce the actual number of generator notifications thatEPA will receive under this rule? Further, how will the consolidated definitionof generator of PCB waste affect the costs associated with manifestingwaste shipments and records retention? Will the proposed definition causeconflicts with State hazardous waste programs that currently regulate PCBs,and if so, how could those conflicts be minimized? Alternative definitionsof ``generator'' are also solicited by the Agency. C. The Universe of PCB Waste The PCB regulatory universe is not characterized to any significant degreeby sites of new manufacture or processing of PCBs as a part of a facility'sregular industrial operations. In fact, the amount of regulated PCB wastesassociated with ``new'' manufacturing by chemical manufacturers and processors(see ``excluded manufacturing processes'' definition at 40 CFR 761.3) hasbeen estimated at approximately 10,000 to 40,000 pounds of PCBs, an amountwhich pales in comparison to the 312 million pounds of PCBs that are estimatedto be dispersed among the nearly 30 million discrete units of electricalequipment that are potentially subject to TSCA disposal requirements. Interms of total volume, the PCB fluids in electrical equipment are estimatedto amount to 1.46 billion gallons of material. The PCB waste universe is in fact dominated by that component associatedwith the end use of electrical equipment products, which by design, containdielectric fluids and insulating fluids. These fluids were laden with PCBseither by purposeful design, or by inadvertent cross-contamination throughyears of servicing and manufacture. PCBs were introduced into commercein 1929. Prior to concerns being raised in the early 1970's about theirtoxicity and persistence, some 1.25 billion pounds were used in the UnitedStates by various industries that found PCBs advantageous in their productsbecause of their chemical and thermal stability and their non-flammability.In terms of intentional production, approximately 965 million of the 1.25billion pounds of PCBs used in the United States were installed in thedielectric fluids of transformers and capacitors. Another 100 million poundsof PCBs were placed in service in the fluids of hydraulic and heat transferequipment, while 45 million pounds were used as plasticizers in carbonlesscopy paper. In addition, there was heavy use (115 million pounds) of PCBsin dispersive applications such as uses as plasticizers in synthetic resinsand rubbers, epoxy paints, and protective coatings. PCBs have also beenused in machine-tool cutting oils; in high-vacuum oils, mining machineryoils, and the oils used in the compressors of natural gas pipelines; inspecialized lubricants and gasket sealers; in printing inks, textile dyes,and synthetic adhesives; in sealers used as water-proofing compounds andputty; and as extenders in investment casting waxes and pesticides. Mostof the latter uses dispersed  PCBs to the environment years ago, and areno longer controllable by regulation. The ``closed'' uses such as electricalfluids and coolants are responsible for the greatest volumes of PCB wastesthat are subject to the TSCA disposal regulations. When EPA began its PCB regulatory program in 1978, the Agency estimatedthat the prior years of PCB usage had already caused some 150 million poundsof PCBs to have been released irretrievably to the environment. EPA estimatedthat another 290 million pounds of PCBs had been placed in landfills anddumps prior to the enactment of the regulations controlling PCB disposal.However, at the outset of the program, EPA estimated that the great bulkof intentionally produced PCBs, that is some 758 million pounds, was stillin service in products, with the use in electrical equipment (transformers,capacitors, etc.) accounting for 750 million pounds of the in-service quantities.Transformers have a useful life of 30 to 40 years, while capacitors typicallyhave a 15- to 20-year average life. The relatively long life of this equipmentsuggests that the PCB disposal program will be active for several decades,since most of the PCB-containing electrical equipment has been authorizedunder the existing regulations for the remainder of its useful life (40CFR 761.30(a)). However, the fact that the 750 million pounds originallyestimated to be in service in electrical equipment has been reduced in10 years to approximately 310 million pounds indicates that the disposalof PCBs is progressing at an accelerated pace.This development is due in part to several mandatory equipment phase-outsthat were announced in the Electrical Equipment Rule of August 25, 1982(47 FR 37357) and the more recent PCB Fires Rule of July 17, 1985 (50 FR29170). The Electrical Equipment Rule required that ``PCB Transformers''installed at food and feed facilities be eliminated by October, 1985, whilePCB Capacitors at these same facilities must be eliminated by October,1988. More significantly, this rule requires that nearly one-half of themore than 2.8 million Large PCB Capacitors that were estimated to be inservice in 1984 be eliminated from use by October, 1988, unless they aresituated in restricted access substation or industrial locations. Finally,by the terms of the July 17, 1985 PCB Fires Rule, a significant numberof the nearly 100,000 PCB Transformers that are not located in utilitysubstations may be designated for disposal because of restrictions announcedin that rule for PCB Transformers in or near commercial buildings. Thatrule requires the phaseout of transformers with certain specificationsby October, 1990, and the installation of enhanced electrical protectionon other units by the same date. Because of these mandatory phaseout requirements and restrictions, EPAexpects that the next 3 years will be a peak period for PCB disposal. Electricalfluids and equipment are expected to account for the preponderance of PCBwaste volume, although significant amounts may also be derived from contaminatednatural gas pipeline condensates and wastes, hydraulic and heat transferequipment fluids that are not yet in compliance with the 50 ppm cut-offon authorized use, and PCB-contaminated materials and debris associatedwith remedial actions at Superfund sites, sites of PCB spills, or pre-TSCAdisposal sites. D. Evaluation of the PCB Disposal Program <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Background </ITAG>For a period extending more than 3 years prior to the issuance of thisproposal, EPA and the Congress have examined issues and incidents thatconcern the management of PCB waste disposal under TSCA. Congressionaloversight committees have held during this period several hearings whichhave probed incidents which the committee members believe cast some doubtupon EPA's ability to ensure that PCB wastes are in fact being properlydisposed at permitted PCB disposal facilities. In conjunction with thishigh level of Congressional interest, EPA has itself conducted a thoroughevaluation of its PCB disposal program, with a view to identifying thoseareas where improvements are needed. The significance of the PCB disposal program evaluation cannot be overstated,since EPA has decided to retain its disposal program for PCBs under TSCAauthority for the foreseeable future, rather than proceed with a rulemakinglisting PCBs as hazardous wastes subject to RCRA management standards.The Agency found that after 10 years of experience with and adaptationto the TSCA disposal requirements, a wholesale transfer of the programto RCRA would be far more complex and potentially disruptive than originallyanticipated. EPA concluded that the administrative process alone (i.e.,the listing rulemaking and the necessity of numerous amendments to theRCRA system to accommodate PCBs) would be extremely resource intensiveand time consuming with little, if any, additional benefit to health orthe environment. Moreover, EPA does not believe that the necessary regulatory amendmentsto RCRA could be accomplished in time to deal with the expected peak demandfor PCB disposal which EPA anticipates will occur during the next severalyears, as the mandatory phaseouts for certain electrical equipment becomeeffective. Indeed, EPA was very concerned that the pendency of a listingregulation during the peak period of PCB disposal would have a disruptiveinfluence on the orderly disposal of large quantities of PCB waste, sincesome PCB users might be inclined to change their position by acceleratingtheir rate of PCB waste generation, to avoid the costs of RCRA's more burdensomeadministrative requirements. From the Agency's standpoint, the pendencyof a rule bringing PCB disposal under RCRA would essentially preempt anymomentum for pursuing the needed amendments to the TSCA program that mightbe undertaken in time to meet the peak disposal period. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Program Evaluation Findings </ITAG>While a number of Congressional proceedings and reports have probed variousaspects of the PCB disposal program, the most significant of these proceedingswere hearings conducted by the Subcommittee on Environment, Energy, andNatural Resources, a subcommittee of the Committee on Government Operationsin the House of Representatives. The Subcommittee held hearings on August13, 1986, and again on April 6, 1987. At each of these hearings, Subcommitteemembers probed incidents which were alleged to reflect permitting and enforcementlapses at TSCA-permitted disposal facilities. At each proceeding, the Subcommitteeconcluded that there were serious deficiencies in the TSCA program's abilityto track the movement of PCB waste from generators to disposers. The lackof a manifest system for PCB wastes was specifically addressed as a significantdeficiency in the PCB disposal program. The Subcommittee probed allegationsof storage and disposal violations at several permitted disposal facilities,and it found especially troubling the lack of any Agency tracking or permittingoversight over the activities of the transporters and off-site, intermediatestorers who may function as commercial ``brokers'' of disposal serviceswith respect to others' PCB wastes. The inability of disposal program managersto identify definitively the intermediate handlers (commercial storers,brokers, transporters) of PCB wastes was highlighted as a fundamental shortcomingin the current national program, particularly with regard to those entitieswhich operate outside the TSCA disposal permitting program. The PCB programwas further criticized because none of the intermediate storers operatingoutside the disposal permitting process are required to undergo any kindof review that evaluates their qualifications or their financial responsibilityfor properly closing and cleaning up their facilities.In response to the findings of the Subcommittee, EPA conducted its ownevaluation of its Regional and Headquarters permitting and enforcementfunctions relating to PCB disposal. This evaluation concluded that therewas an urgent need to adopt a means of tracking the movement of PCB wasteto its ultimate disposition, and a need to develop definitive data on who,other than permitted disposers, is handling PCB waste, and where it isbeing handled. The lack of this very basic information is a serious handicapbecause it contributes to EPA's inability to track the disposal of PCBwaste, and the Agency's inability to target PCB storers and brokers forcompliance inspections. In addition, EPA's evaluation identified a needto enhance EPA's approval oversight of the disposers currently subjectto approvals (permits), and the commercial storers for which there is notcurrently an approval process. The program improvements called for in the Subcommittee proceedings andin the Agency's own evaluation constitute an ambitious agenda. The urgencyof this agenda is accentuated by the recent decision to retain the PCBdisposal program under TSCA, and the imminence of the peak period of PCBdisposal. EPA is working on several fronts to develop the needed guidanceor rules to cure the deficiencies which the Agency and Congress have identified.However, EPA concludes that the absence of a PCB waste tracking systemand the absence of approval authority over the commercial storers of PCBwastes represent the most urgent of the program's deficiencies. Therefore,EPA has focused upon these subjects as the scope of this proposed rule,so that the regulation may be promulgated on an expedited basis. <ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Discussion of the Proposed Rule </ITAG>A. Purpose of Proposed Tracking System The proposed tracking system for PCB wastes serves several objectives aimedat improving the management and enforcement of the national disposal programfor PCBs. First, the notification requirement will provide EPA with basicinformation on the location of and activities engaged in by many of thosepersons who handle (generate, store, transport, or dispose) PCB wastes.Second, the collection of this information will facilitate compliance monitoringand enforcement under TSCA by EPA inspectors. A data base of PCB wastehandlers will provide EPA with a basis for targeting facilities for siteinspections. Third, the submission of notifications by PCB waste handlers will be aprerequisite to the issuance by EPA of identification numbers to the notifyingentities. Upon receipt of notifications, EPA will issue unique identificationnumbers to all entities required to notify under this rule, unless theyhave previously been issued numbers by EPA or by State agencies under RCRAhazardous waste authority. The use of the EPA identification numbers willbe required in the manifests and the associated reports which togetherconstitute the waste tracking system. When this rule is effective, generatorsof PCB waste may only turn over their waste to commercial storers, transporters,and disposers of PCB waste who have notified EPA of their PCB waste activitiesand received EPA identification numbers and any required approvals. Likewise,commercial storers, transporters, and disposers of PCB waste may only acceptPCB waste from other commercial storers, transporters, and disposers whohave notified EPA of their PCB waste activities. Fourth, by implementing the notification and manifesting requirements,EPA will be able to track shipments of PCB wastes from the point of generation,through the commercial storage facilities and other intermediate wastehandlers, to the TSCA permitted disposal units. This tracking device createsclear lines of accountability among PCB waste handlers. While owners andoperators of storage and disposaI facilities are required under the currentPCB regulations to keep some records on their overall disposition of PCBwastes, the preparation and retention of manifests among facilities' recordswill provide more uniform and detailed information on the handling of particularwaste shipments as they make their way to disposal sites. Fifth, the use of a manifest system will foster the proper handling ofPCB wastes while they are in transport for disposal. The information onthe manifest will augment the marking and placarding requirements for containersand transport vehicles in the existing PCB regulations. The informationrecorded in the manifest will promote protection of health and the environmentby serving a notice function for persons handling PCB waste as well asemergency response personnel.B. Notification <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Background </ITAG>Under today's proposal, certain persons who generate, store commercially,transport, or dispose of regulated PCB wastes would file a notificationof such activities with EPA and receive an EPA identification number. Thisnotification requirement would apply to brokers of PCB disposal servicesto the extent that they qualify as transporters or disposers, or as storersof PCB waste subject to the storage facility requirements of 40 CFR 761.65.The notification requirement proposed today is similar to the notificationprocess which EPA proposed for hazardous waste activities on July 11, 1978(43 FR 29908). The notification process under RCRA section 3010 was finalizedwith the publication of a hazardous waste activity notification form onFebruary 26, 1980 (45 FR 12746). The RCRA notification program was basedon a direct statutory requirement within section 3010 of RCRA. This sectionof RCRA requires any person who generates or transports hazardous wasteor who owns or operates a facility for the treatment, storage, or disposalof hazardous wastes to notify EPA, or States having authorized hazardouswaste programs under RCRA, of their hazardous waste activity. This statutoryrequirement has enabled EPA to develop a computer database on the hazardouswaste handlers who constitute the RCRA-regulated universe. Based upon theevaluation of the PCB disposal program by EPA and the Congress, EPA hasdetermined that a database on the activities of PCB waste handlers is equallynecessary. The Agency has further concluded that the creation of this informationcollection is within TSCA's section 6(e) statutory authority. Similar to RCRA, EPA is proposing that the TSCA notification process belinked to manifesting under TSCA, which is another subject of this proposal.Upon notification, persons would be issued a unique EPA identificationnumber. On the date 120 days after the effective date of the final rule,it would be illegal to receive regulated PCB wastes from a person who doesnot have an EPA identification number. Likewise, on this same date, itwould be illegal to deliver any regulated PCB waste to another waste handlerwho does not have an identification number. Generators of PCB waste whoare exempted from notification requirements under proposed andSection; 761.205(c)(1)would be deemed as having received by rule the identification number ``40CFR Part 761.'' In the event a person has notified EPA within the 60-dayperiod provided in the proposed rule, and EPA has not issued or confirmedan identification number for that person, the person would be entitledto use either the number ``40 CFR Part 761'' or a specific number assignedto that person by EPA or a state under RCRA, until EPA assigns or confirmsthe use of an identification number under this rule. EPA proposes that a standard form be used for PCB waste activity notificationsunder TSCA. The proposed form is set out at andSection; 761.205(a)(3) ofthis proposed rule, and it is based on existing EPA Form 8700-12, ``Notificationof Hazardous Waste Activity'' (43 FR 12745, as revised 11/85). The formhas been tailored to the requirements specified under this rule for notificationunder TSCA. However, the general format of the Hazardous Waste Activityform has been preserved as far as possible, to facilitate compliance anddata entry. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Who Must File Notifications </ITAG>This proposal would require certain generators and all disposers, transporters,and commercial storers of regulated PCB waste to file a notification formidentifying their PCB waste facilities and activities. Each generator,transporter, disposer, and commercial storer of PCB waste who notifiesunder this rule would receive from EPA a unique identification number identifyingeach facility involved with the handling of PCB wastes. The only generatorswho would notify EPA as unique facilities under this proposal would begenerators who store the PCB wastes they generate at storage facilitieswhich they own or operate, and which are subject to andSection; 761.65(b)storage facility standards. Generators, commercial storers, transporters, and disposers of PCB wastewould check the appropriate box on the form identifying their type of PCBwaste activity. a. <T3>Facilities that have notified previously under RCRA. </T3>In instanceswhere facilities have previously been issued RCRA identification numbers,the facility would indicate on the space provided in Item III of the formtheir RCRA identification numbers. EPA will use for TSCA purposes the sameidentification numbers previously issued to facilities by EPA or statesunder RCRA. However, EPA emphasizes that facilities which have previouslynotified under RCRA would be required to notify again for purposes of identifyingunder TSCA the location and nature of their PCB waste activities, as wellas their identification numbers previously issued to them. b. <T3>Notification by generators. </T3>This proposal adopts a different approachthan under RCRA regarding the notification requirements that apply to generatorsof PCB waste. EPA has concluded that it would not be efficient to requireseparate notifications by all persons who generate PCB waste. The universeof PCB waste generators is dominated by many thousands of end users ofPCB electrical equipment. For example, there are about 3,320 utility companiesthat use and store significant numbers of PCB Items, and there may be asmany as 117,000 nonutility facilities that use PCB-containing electricalequipment. While some of these users may possess substantial inventoriesof PCBs and PCB Items, and therefore routinely generate PCB wastes, manyof these users possess only a few PCB articles that would potentially besubject to TSCA disposal requirements. The administrative burden of notificationon both EPA and these many end users would be unreasonable where the notificationwould facilitate the tracking of only one, or a very few articles of PCBwaste. The utility to the Agency of a data base that contained informationon the one-time or sporadic generators of PCB waste would be far outweighedby the costs of submitting and processing the information. Therefore, EPA is proposing a notification requirement for generators thatfocuses upon the larger volume users, owners, and processors of PCBs whostore the PCB wastes which they generate at their own andSection; 761.65(b)storage facilities. These are the generators who may be expected to utilizePCB disposal services on a fairly regular or large-scale basis, and forwhom it is administratively efficient to require particular informationabout their PCB waste generation activities. Such generators would notconstruct and operate their own PCB storage facilites unless they generatedPCB wastes with the frequency and volume that would merit incurring thecosts of construction and maintenance of these facilities. It is appropriatethat these generator/storers be a part of the Agency's database of regularhandlers of PCB waste. In submitting their notifications to EPA, members of this class of generator/storerswould submit a notification form for each of their storage areas that issubject to andSection; 761.65(b). EPA would issue a unique identificationnumber to each notifying storage facility, and this identification numberwould correspond to the physical location of the facility. EPA anticipatesthat this class of generators will consist primarily of utilities and otherheavy industrial users of PCB electrical equipment. These users typicallyoperate storage and maintenance yards where PCB wastes are Iikely to begenerated or consolidated prior to off-site disposal. Also, members ofthe transformer service and repair industry would be likely members ofthis class, because of the significant volumes of PCB waste which theymay generate during the routine servicing, rebuilding, repairing, retrofilling,or salvaging of electrical equipment. c. <T3>Generators who need not notify. </T3>Other generators of PCB wastewho do not maintain storage areas subject to the andSection; 761.65(b) storagefacility standards would be exempt from the requirements to notify EPAand obtain unique identification numbers. These exempt generators wouldinstead use the generic identification number ``40 CFR PART 761'' on theirmanifests in lieu of a unique facility identification number. This exemption would operate only as an exemption from the generator notificationrequirement; it would not exempt these generators from the obligation toprepare manifests to accompany their shipments of PCB wastes. As explainedmore fully in Unit IV.C, this proposed rule would require that all shipmentsinvolving PCB wastes be fully manifested, if any part of the shipment containsPCBs at levels equal to or exceeding 50 ppm. Any generator initiating sucha waste shipment would initiate a manifest under this proposal. d. <T3>Other definitions. For the purpose of today's proposed regulation:</T3>``Commercial Storer of PCB waste'' would mean the owner or operator ofa storage facility which is subject to the storage facility standards of40 CFR 761.65(b), and which engages in storage activities involving PCBwastes generated or owned by others. Commercial storers of PCB waste generallyperform waste storage services in exchange for a fee or other compensation,but the receipt of compensation would not be necessary to qualify a storagefacility as a commercial storer of PCB wastes. It would be sufficient thatthe facility stores PCB wastes generated or owned by others. Commercialstorers of PCB waste would be required to comply with the andSection; 761.65(b)facility standards, the storage facility approval requirements of andSection;761.65(d), the recordkeeping requirements of andSection; 761.180(b), andthe applicable requirements of the tracking system for PCB wastes proposedin this document. ``Transfer facility'' would be defined as any transportation related facilityincluding loading docks, parking areas, storage areas, and other similarareas where shipments of PCB waste are held during the normal course oftransportation. PCB storage areas at transfer facilities would be requiredto comply with the storage facility standards of andSection; 761.65, butthey would be exempt from the approval requirements of andSection; 761.65(d),unless the same PCB wastes are stored at such facilities for longer than10 consecutive days after they receive PCB wastes. Transport vehicles wouldnot be transfer facilities within the meaning of this definition, unlessthe transport vehicle is being used for the storage of PCB wastes, ratherthan for actual transport activities. The proposed rule also contains definitions of ``designated facility,''``disposer of PCB waste,'' ``EPA identification number,'' ``manifest,''``off-site,'' `` PCB waste,'' and ``transporter of PCB waste.'' EPA invites comment on the proposed definitions, and the scope of the notificationrequirement proposed in this rule. In particular, comments are requestedon these subjects: i. The feasibility of assigning by rule a generic identification number(e.g., ``40 CFR PART 761'') to be used in manifests by those generatorswho would be exempted from notification by the proposal, but still subjectto Federal manifesting requirements. Will transporters, commercial storers,and disposers of PCB wastes have reservations about accepting wastes andmanifests with non unique generator identification numbers? ii. The appropriateness of designating generators having storage facilitiessubject to andSection; 761.65(b) facility standards for PCB storage as theclass of PCB waste generators who must submit notifications to EPA, andtreating each of their storage facilities as unique generators. Is thisthe most effective criterion for identifying the PCB users, owners, andprocessors who generate PCB waste with the frequency and in the quantitiesthat warrant inclusion in the Agency's facility-specific database of PCBwaste handlers? Are there alternative criteria that would identify othergenerators of concern without overwhelming the database with many thousandsof end users who may individually hold only a small amount of PCB material,or who may generate PCB waste very infrequently? iii. The feasibility of including PCB storage areas at transfer facilitiesamong the storage facilities subject to the andSection; 761.65 facility standardsfor the storage of PCB wastes. This proposal would, however, exempt storageat transfer facilities from the approval requirements that apply to commercialstorers of PCB waste, unless PCB waste is stored at such facilities forperiods exceeding 10 days. This 10-day approval exemption is consistentwith the similar exemption under RCRA for storage of hazardous wastes attransfer facilities. The Agency requests comment on the appropriatenessof the proposed 10 day exemption from storage approval requirements. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. Notification Process </ITAG>EPA is proposing a sample notification form and instructions for all thosewho may be required to notify. EPA will try to inform those affected bythis proposal of the rule's contents, so that the effort to reach the regulatedcommunity of PCB waste handlers can have maximum effect. Specifically,EPA will contact relevant industry associations, including associationsrepresenting the utilities and the other large non-utility manufacturingindustries that are likely to be the heaviest generators of PCB waste.The Agency will also work closely with the several groups who have expressedinterest in the issues involved with this regulation, and have indicatedtheir willingness to provide lists of their members to facilitate notification.Failure of the EPA's outreach efforts to reach any affected person willnot, however, relieve that person of the legal requirement to notify underthe final rule. Members of the public affected by the final rule are thereforeencouraged to obtain or make copies of the rule and included sample NotificationForm, and distribute them to the other generators, commercial storers,transporters, and disposers with whom they deal so that all may be in compliancewith the requirement to file a notification form within 60 days of thefinal rule's effective date. <ITAG tagnum="81">4. When To Notify </ITAG>Because of the urgency involved in implementing the waste tracking systemin time to meet the imminent peak in PCB disposal demand, EPA will promulgatethis rule on an expedited basis. This proposed rule announces a publiccomment period for written comments of only 30 days, and commentors areasked to submit their comments forthwith so that they may be consideredin preparing the final rule. EPA intends to promulgate and make effectivea final rule under an expedited schedule. The final rule will only providefor a 60-day period after the rule's effective date for notifications tobe received by the Agency. EPA believes that this expedited rulemakingschedule is reasonable in light of the fact that the regulation adoptsin large part the existing RCRA tracking system with which most affectedpersons are already familiar. EPA recognizes that this expedited schedule poses some potential for confusionamong the generators desiring to procure PCB disposal services, as theywill need to be certain that they are dealing with transporters, commercialstorers, and disposers who have in fact complied with the notificationrequirements. Therefore, to facilitate an orderly notification process,EPA recommends that entities who perceive that they are likely to be affectedby these proposed notification requirements notify EPA during the 90-dayperiod immediately after publication of this proposed rule. The samplenotification form proposed in this notice may be used to submit an earlynotification to EPA. EPA will process these early notifications as soonas possible by issuing identification numbers. Entities which notify earlywill be assured of receiving the most rapid turnaround in the processingof their notifications. These entitites should have no difficulty in demonstratingto their customers compliance with the requirement to submit a notificationno later than 60 days after the final rule's effective date. EPA emphasizes that the entities who elect to notify early will not waiveany objections or other comments which they may wish to submit during thepublic comment period. The submission of an early notification is entirelyindependent of the right to comment on the proposal, and no one will beprejudiced by submitting an earIy notification. EPA would return to each notifier an acknowledgment of receipt of the notificationform, which would include the notifier's EPA identification number. EPAbelieves that it will be able to process most of the notifications within120 days of the final rule's effective date. However, EPA may not be ableto issue all identification numbers within the 120-day period. Accordingly,EPA is proposing that, in the event a person has notified EPA within the60-day period provided in the proposed rule, and EPA has not issued orconfirmed an identification number for that person within the 120-day periodprovided, the person would be entitled to use either the number ``40 CFRPart 761'' or a specific number previously assigned to that person by EPAor a state under RCRA. The person would be entitled to use this numberonly until EPA assigns or confirms the use of an identification numberunder this rule. Thus, no person who has notified EPA in a timely fashionwill be prevented from continuing its PCB waste activities for lack ofan identification number.In addition, any non-exempt generator, commercial storer, transporter,or disposer of PCB waste who begins PCB waste activities after the effectivedate of the final regulation would be required, prior to handling any PCBwaste, to notify EPA and receive an EPA identification number in accordancewith this proposed rule. Such new entrants into the regulated communitywould not be allowed to operate until they receive an identification number.In the case of disposers of PCB waste and commercial storers of PCB waste,new entrants into these businesses would be required to obtain both EPAidentification numbers and final approvals before they could commence disposalor storage operations. The Agency recommends that applicants for TSCA disposalor storage approvals submit their notification forms during the periodof review of their disposal or storage approval applications. The Agencyemphasizes that in no case would the requirements to notify and obtainidentification numbers excuse compliance by any entity with the 1-yearlimit on storage prior to disposal under 40 CFR 761.65(a). <ITAG tagnum="81">5. When To Notify </ITAG>There are numerous Federal officials responsible for distinct pieces ofthe PCB disposal program, and some states also regulate PCB disposal undertheir own regulatory programs. EPA believes that the notification processcan only work if administered centrally. Therefore, EPA proposes that notificationsby PCB waste handlers be submitted to EPA Headquarters at the followingaddress: Chief, Chemical Regulation Branch, Office of Toxic Substances(TS-798), Rm. NE-117, Environmental Protection Agency, 401 M St., SW.,Washington, DC 20460. <ITAG tagnum="81">6. Information Required for Notification </ITAG>The proposed notification form is set out at andSection; 761.205(a)(3) ofthis proposed rule; however, the form will not appear in the Code of FederalRegulations when the final rule is published. This section of the preambledescribes the information required on the proposed notification form. An area at the top of the form is labelled ``For Official Use Only.'' Thisunnumbered section is to be completed by EPA officials and should be disregardedby the notifier. In this space, EPA will enter any comments, the notifier'sEPA identification number, an approval code, and the date on which EPAreceives the notification form. Items to be filled out by the respondent are numbered I through VII. Thename of the facility submitting the notification would be indicated inItem I, and if the facility has already received an EPA identificationnumber under RCRA, that number would be supplied in Item II. Item III would contain the mailing address of the respondent, while ItemIV would contain the actual location of the installation, since the location(a physical address) may not be the same as the mailing address. Wheremobile disposal facilities are involved, the respondent would be instructedto write ``mobile'' on the space in Item IV, and to supply on the spacein Item III, the mailing address of the facility's installation contactidentified in Item V. Item V, Installation Contact, would contain the name of an individual atthe facility who can be contacted by EPA to clarify information on thenotification form or provide information in the event of a spill or otheremergency. The individual's telephone number would be specified here aswell. Item VI, Type of PCB Waste Activity, would ask the respondent to indicatewhether the facility to which the notification applies is a generator,commercial storer, transporter, or approved disposer of PCB waste. ``Commercialstorer of PCB waste'' here would refer to those storage facilities whichstore PCB wastes owned or generated by others. The term would not applyto the storage sites maintained by the owners or users of PCBs who initiallygenerate PCB waste when they remove PCBs from service. Where transportersand disposers also maintain storage facilities for PCB waste subject to40 CFR 761.65(b), they would need to check both the commercial storer boxand the relevant transporter or disposer box in this section. The final section of the form, Item VII, Certification, would be signedand dated by the owner, operator, or authorized representative of the installation.An ``authorized representative'' is a person responsible for the overalloperation of the facility. In preparing this notification form, EPA modified the existing form usedunder RCRA (EPA Form 8700-12, Rev. 11/85) for notification of hazardouswaste activities. EPA believes that this form as modified is adequate forthe purposes of PCB notification under TSCA, considering the similarityof the intent of RCRA hazardous waste activity notification and TSCA PCBnotifications. EPA welcomes any comments on this form; however, to theextent that changes to the form are made in the final rule, EPA assuresthose who elect to notify during the pendency of the rulemaking that theywill not be asked to notify anew because of any such changes. <ITAG tagnum="81">7. Claims of Confidentiality </ITAG>TSCA section 14 addresses the confidentiality of business information reportedto EPA, or otherwise obtained by EPA, in administering TSCA. (15 U.S.C.2613(a)). EPA's rules implementing section 14 appear in 40 CFR Part 2.While information submitted in a reporting form may ordinarily be claimedas confidential, EPA has purposely designed the proposed notification formso that its preparation will not require the submission of any data thatEPA believes would be confidential business information (CBI) under TSCA.The form would merely ask for the most basic of information regarding thename, location, and general description of PCB waste handling activitiesengaged in by notifying entities. It does not ask for information on quantitiesprocessed, customers, technical processes, financial information, or forany other information which, when linked to a company's name, could adverselyaffect a company's competitive position. EPA has determined that the following information will not be treated asconfidential business information: The name of the facility, other EPAidentification numbers issued to the facility, the facility's mailing address,information about the facility's ownership, the location of the facility,the facility's installation contact, or the type of PCB activities engagedin at the facility. The reasons for this determination are: (1) The information is reasonably available from other sources. (2) If disclosed, it is unlikely to affect adversely the submitter's competitiveposition. (3) The information is neither commercial nor financial information protectedfrom disclosure under TSCA or the Freedom of Information Act. This information will be disclosed to the public without further noticeto the submitter unless the submitter provides a written justification(submitted with the notification information) which demonstrates extraordinaryreasons why the information is entitled to confidential treatment. <ITAG tagnum="81">8. EPA Identification Number </ITAG>To maintain consistency with the RCRA notification procedures already inplace, and to avoid subjecting those who may already possess RCRA identificationnumbers to the burden of being assigned multiple numbers, EPA proposesto use the numbering system adopted under RCRA for today's proposal underTSCA. The RCRA numbering system currently assigns each notifier a 12-digit number.The first 2 characters indicate the State in which the facility is located;the remaining 10 characters are the Dun and Bradstreet Data Universal Numbering(DUN) system numbers. The DUN system provides the most nearly completelisting of U.S. businesses. Federal agencies, which are not included inthe DUN system, would be assigned their General Services AdministrationReal Property Number. State and local government installations would alsobe assigned unique numbers. Where notifications are submitted by mobiledisposal facilities, the identification number that EPA assigns would correspondto the business' corporate headquarters or other business location identifiedin Item III of the notification form. EPA requests comments on the useof this proposed numbering system. Where there are problems identifiedwith the proposal, EPA requests that alternatives be suggested that wouldbe more workable or efficient.<ITAG tagnum="81">9. Relationship to CERCLA Notifications </ITAG>In addition, EPA emphasizes that the notification requirements containedin this proposed rule are in no way related to and would not affect theindependent notification requirements under the Comprehensive EnvironmentalResponse, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980 (CERCLA), as amended.The proposed rule would not alter the responsibilities of a person in chargeof an onshore or offshore facility or vessel to notify the National ResponseCenter of the release of a reportable quantity (RQ) or more of PCBs orany other hazardous substance as defined under CERCLA. Under CERCLA sections 103 (a) and (b), any person in charge of an offshoreor onshore facility or vessel is required to report to the National ResponseCenter as soon as he or she has knowledge of any release of a hazardoussubstance that is equal to or greater than the RQ. However, as stated ina final rule published on April 4, 1985 (50 FR 13461) regarding RQs, disposalof hazardous substances at a disposal facility in accordance with EPA regulationsis not subject to the CERCLA notification requirements. Thus, if PCB wastesare properly disposed of in a TSCA approved facility, and this is properlydocumented through manifests and other records, CERCLA notification isnot required. However, spills and accidents which occur during disposalactivities, and which result in releases of an RQ or more of PCB waste,must be reported to the National Response Center. Additionally, any PCBreleases (as opposed to disposal) of an RQ or more from a TSCA storageor disposal facility must be reported under CERCLA. C. Manifesting <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Background on RCRA Manifesting System </ITAG>When Congress enacted RCRA in 1976, it included in section 3002 of theAct an express mandate to create a manifest system to assure that hazardouswastes are designated for and in fact arrive at approved treatment, storage,and disposal facilities. On February 26, 1980, EPA issued a rule publishedin the <T4>Federal Register </T4> which announced the creation of the RCRA manifestsystem (45 FR 12722). The manifest system is the centerpiece of the ``cradle-to-grave''tracking system which EPA and the States rely upon to ensure that hazardouswaste designated for off-site management actually reaches its destination.The manifest acts as a control and shipping document that accompanies thewaste from its point of generation to its point of destination. The manifestalso acts as a record which remains in the files of waste handlers, andfrom which information may be culled for periodic reports summarizing overallwaste activities. EPA first proposed manifest requirements for hazardous wastes on December18, 1978 (43 FR 58969). The original manifest regulation of February 26,1980 designated the information that was required to accompany waste shipments,but it did not prescribe a standard form. At the time, EPA believed thatthere was greater benefit in a flexible approach to manifesting, fearingthat the creation of a standard form would be too rigid a means of reconcilingthe various requirements of EPA, the States, and the Department of Transportation(DOT). Shortly after the initiation of the manifest system, EPA received a numberof requests to reconsider its decision rejecting a standard form manifest.These petitioners pointed out that there had arisen among the States amultitude of manifest forms, and that compliance with these differing Stateforms had created a burden on generators, transporters, and the State programs.The use of varying manifest forms complicated enforcement activities, preventedgenerators from adopting standard manifesting procedures, and forced transportersto carry multiple manifests for the States through which they moved. EPAresponded to these requests by issuing a proposed rule requiring the useof a uniform national manifest (43 FR 9336, March 4, 1982). The final ruleadopting the uniform national manifest (49 FR 10490, March 20, 1984) wasdeveloped jointly by EPA and DOT, and the uniform manifest has been a RCRArequirement since September 20, 1984. EPA is proposing in this document to require the use of the Uniform HazardousWaste Manifest (Uniform Manifest) form by the handlers of PCB wastes. Theuse of the Uniform Manifest for PCB waste shipments will facilitate compliancewith both TSCA and RCRA, and it will avoid the confusion and expense thatwould arise from the requirement of any other document. EPA believes thatthe Uniform Manifest can be adapted fairly easily to PCB wastes, with onlyslight interpretive changes, and a slight change in the copy distributionrequirements. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. EPA's Rationale for Proposing a Manifest System </ITAG>The most frequently cited deficiency in the TSCA disposal program for PCBsis the absence of sufficient program oversight to assure that regulatedPCB wastes are in fact being disposed of at permitted disposal sites. TheAgency believes there is some merit in these concerns and has determinedthat a tracking system based on the Uniform Manifest system requirementscan play a valuable role in addressing these concerns. A valuable attribute of manifesting is that the manifest system shiftssome part of the waste tracking ``enforcement'' burden to the generatorsof waste. The generator bears the responsibility for demonstrating thatthe waste which it ships actually arrives at the designated off-site storageor disposal site. The paper trail established by the manifest confirmsthe physical delivery of waste to commercial storers, transporters, anddesignated disposers, thereby providing for checks and balances on theactivities of waste handlers. In addition, the several reporting requirementsallied with the manifest system operate as ``red flags'' triggering Agencyattention when anomalies develop. By documenting the progress of wastefrom the site of generation to the site of commercial storage or disposal,the routing of the manifest in effect acts as a surrogate for the inspectionof each phase of waste handling. EPA is aware that a manifest system is not infallible. A system that substitutessurveillance of shipping documents for surveillance of actual waste handlingis vulnerable to abuse. In a 1985 report entitled ``Illegal Disposal ofHazardous Waste: Difficult to Detect or Deter,'' the General AccountingOffice (GAO) highlighted the fact that the RCRA manifest system has notbeen an altogether successful tool for <T3>detecting </T3>instances of illegal hazardous waste disposal. The GAOreport concluded that manifesting was effective in <T3>deterring </T3>illegal disposal practices, but that the unscrupulouswaste handler bent on noncompliance could circumvent the existing trackingsystem. The GAO report found that many of the waste handlers implicated in investigationsof illegal disposal had not notified EPA or the State in accordance withthe law. The report also disclosed a lack of diligence by generators inverifying the receipt of waste by disposers, as well as fraud by transporters(e.g., forging the disposer's signature on manifests) as two of the moreprevalent shortcomings revealed in the enforcement records that the GAOexamined. In today's proposal, EPA includes additional safeguards whichare intended to address the concerns identified in the GAO report. Clearly, a manifest system will not achieve the same level of oversightpossible in the ideal world, where enforcement inspectors would be on thescene to verify every aspect of waste handling. That ideal is simply notachievable, and EPA must rely upon more feasible means of monitoring themovement of waste that depends to some extent on cooperation and complianceby the great majority of waste handlers, especially generators. In short,EPA is not aware of a feasible alternative that accomplishes a greaterIevel of oversight and deterrence than the manifest system. Therefore,EPA is proposing a tracking system for PCB wastes modeled after the RCRAUniform Manifest system. EPA invites comment on the appropriateness ofthis system for the tracking of PCB waste disposal. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. Who Must Originate a Manifest  </ITAG>A manifest is a shipping document and record that verifies the dispositionof PCB waste after its generation. The manifest requirement proposed todaywould require all generators of PCB waste at concentrations of 50 ppm orgreater to manifest their waste shipments, regardless of whether the generatorwas required to notify EPA under the proposed notification provision discussedin Unit IV.B. of this document. Where PCB waste shipments consist solelyof PCB wastes below 50 ppm, this rule would not require generators to preparea manifest. Manifests for waste shipments under 50 ppm would be required,of course, if such manifests are required under the laws of a State whichregulates PCB disposal. EPA has rejected the use of any ``small quantity generator'' exclusionbased on volume of PCBs or numbers of PCB Items held by a generator. Thefrequency with which PCB disposal may occur can be very sporadic for individualgenerators, and the volumes of waste generated over specified periods oftime may vary dramatically because of differences in fluid capacities amongindividual PCB articles. So, the designation of a small quantity cutoffwould be likely to produce arbitrary results. While the utilities wouldbe expected to aggregate their wastes in quantities which exceed any smallquantity cutoff, there is a large segment of the total universe of regulatedPCBs that is distributed among many end users who own only a few piecesof PCB equipment. It would defeat the purpose of the proposed trackingsystem if the small quantity cutoff had the effect of so fragmenting thePCB universe that only the waste owned by the utilities and the large industrialusers was tracked to disposal. In addition, adopting for PCB wastes theRCRA 100 kg/month small quantities cutoff would be essentially meaningless,since the shipment of even one small PCB Transformer (40 gallons or 235kg dielectric) would exceed such a cutoff. EPA solicits comment on thisaspect of the proposal.EPA is proposing to require manifests for shipments containing regulatedPCB wastes at the 50 to 500 ppm level, as well as for shipments containinghigher concentration PCB wastes at the 500 ppm or greater level. The inclusionof the 50 to 500 ppm wastes would extend the coverage of the manifestingrequirement to about 129 million gallons of PCB waste, compared to the42.5 million gallons that would be covered under an option limiting themanifest to the 500 ppm or greater wastes. While one might conclude thatthe proposed option involves an incremental burden that is about threetimes that associated with manifesting only the 500 ppm or greater wastes,EPA has concluded that the actual incremental burden associated with theproposed option is not significant. EPA consulted with States which regulate PCB disposal and with the operatorsof TSCA approved disposal facilities. EPA found that each of the approveddisposal facilities required a manifest to accompany any shipment of regulatedPCB waste, regardless of PCB concentration. These disposal firms requiremanifests for the PCB wastes they accept as a means of preserving recordsof firms potentially responsible for contributing toward any remedial actionswhich might arise at the disposal site. Also, among the 18 States thatcurrently require a manifest to accompany PCB wastes, all but one requirea manifest for wastes containing PCBs at the 50-500 ppm level. Becausecurrent practice appears to be consistent with the proposed 50 ppm triggerfor manifesting, there would not appear to be a significant incrementalburden to industry associated with the proposed option. EPA also considered whether tracking the movement of 50 to 500 ppm PCBwastes would be cost-effective from the Agency's standpoint. The economicanalysis supporting this rulemaking projects that the 50 ppm manifestingthreshold would subject nearly twice as many manifested PCB waste shipmentsto EPA's tracking system. Ordinarily, EPA would not actually receive andreview this additional volume of manifests. Manifest copies generally wouldnot be submitted to EPA, except when an irregularity in a waste shipmentgives rise to the filing of a Discrepancy or Exception Report with EPA.The economic analysis considered the additional number of waste shipmentsbeing tracked under the proposed 50 ppm option, and based on several yearsof experience under RCRA, predicted that fewer than 1% of these shipmentswould trigger a Discrepancy or Exception Report to EPA. The economic analysisconcluded that the number of such reports would number between 65 and 109annually. The annual incremental costs to EPA of filing and reviewing thesereports (assuming $21.75 cost per report) would be nominal. EPA requests comment on the appropriateness of the proposed 50 ppm triggerfor manifesting PCB wastes. In particular, the Agency invites commentswhich would verify or refute EPA's findings about the extent to which manifestingis already occurring with respect to PCB wastes at the 50 ppm or greaterlevel. EPA also invites comments on the alternative option that would triggermanifesting for Federal purposes only at the 500 ppm PCB level or greater.A regulation that required manifesting for wastes contaminated with PCBsat 500 ppm or greater would theoretically control about 98 percent of thetotal pounds of ``pure'' PCBs dispersed among the regulated PCB wastes,while extending coverage to about one-third of the total volume of wastematerials. Would this alternative option in fact avoid any significanteconomic impacts, or does current practice among the States (which thisregulation would <T3>not </T3>preempt) and the disposal industry effectively preclude anysavings that might be realized under this alternative? EPA would considerincluding this alternative option (manifesting only at 500 ppm or greater)in the final regulation if comments submitted to EPA rebut the presumptionthat there are no significant incremental costs associated with the 50ppm option. Such comments would need to convince the Agency: (1) That a500 ppm trigger for manifesting would result in a significant reductionin the real costs of manifesting PCB waste; (2) that the adoption of a500 ppm trigger for manifesting would not be rendered moot by the existingrequirements of States and the current practice of disposal firms; and(3) that excluding the 50 to 500 ppm wastes from a Federal manifestingrequirements would not create confusion or, because of inconsistencieswith State requirements, encourage non-compliance with the States' morestringent requirements. This proposal would require the manifest to be prepared by the generatorat that point in time when the PCB waste is first introduced into commercein a manner that will cause the waste to leave the generator's control.This latter condition would generally be triggered when the generator turnsits waste over to a transporter for delivery to an off-site storage ordisposal facility. The condition would also be satisfied when the wasteis placed on the generator's own transport vehicle for shipment to a commercialoff-site storage or disposal facility, since the waste is then being introducedinto commerce in a manner that will cause the generator to lose controlof the waste. A manifest need not accompany the shipment via transportvehicle of PCB wastes to a storage facility owned or operated by the enduser of PCBs and PCB Items, because these generators have not yet relinquishedcontrol over the PCB waste. This exception would apply to both transportvia the generator's vehicles and transport by an independent transporter,since, in the latter case, the transporter is presumed to be acting pursuantto the generator's instructions. Apart from the exception for shipmentsbetween the end user's own facilities, EPA would construe the provisionregarding when PCB waste leaves the generator's control strictly, so thatthe manifest requirements will have the broadest possible scope. EPA invitescomment on using the ``loss of control'' concept as the criterion for whengenerators must initiate a manifest. EPA also solicits comment on the appropriatenessof the exception for shipments between the end user's own storage facilities.The Agency emphasizes that this proposal affects only the Federal manifestingrequirements for the transport of the PCB wastes that are regulated fordisposal under TSCA. No provision or exception contained in this proposalwould be construed to alter or limit the applicability of any requirementin existing DOT regulations pertaining to the transport of hazardous materials,including PCBs.  <ITAG tagnum="81">4. Information Required in the Manifest </ITAG>The manifest which generators would originate is designed to include onlythe information necessary to identify accurately the persons handling thePCB waste, and the nature and quantity of the waste. These informationrequirements consist essentially of the Federal Information Requirementsdescribed in the March 20, 1984 regulation which announced the adoptionof a Uniform Manifest (49 FR 10497). Use of the manifest would not supercedeany other requirements for PCB wastes under 40 CFR Part 761. a. <T3>Manifest document number. </T3>The manifest document number would consistof the generator's EPA 12 digit identification number, plus a unique suffixof up to 5 digits which the generator would add to ensure the uniquenessof the manifest document number for each shipment from each site of generationduring a calendar year. The 12 digit identification number would consistof the generator's unique identification number issued after notificationto EPA, or the 12 digit reference ``40 CFR PART 761'' for those generatorswho would not be required to notify specifically under this rule. b. <T3>Page number. </T3>Generators would be required to identify on the firstpage of a manifest the total number of pages in that manifest, i.e., thefirst page (EPA Form 8700-22) plus the number of continuation sheets, ifany. For example, if the manifest consists of only one page, and thereis no continuation sheet, then the correct entry would be ``Page 1 of 1.''If the manifest consists of one front page (Form 8700-22) and one continuationsheet, the correct entry is ``Page 1 of 2.'' c. <T3>Generator name and address. </T3>The address to be entered here wouldbe the mailing address of the generator to which the designated storageor disposal facility must return promptly a completed copy of the manifest.The generator would enter the mailing address of the location that willadminister the returning manifest forms, which could be the company's billingoffice, corporate headquarters, or the site of generation. While the addressentered here need not identify the particular site of generation, the generator'smanifest records would be maintained so that unique waste shipments (identifiedby the unique manifest document number assigned by the generator) can beidentified with the actual sites of generation.d. <T3>Generator's telephone number. </T3>This would be the number of a personwho can provide information about the shipment in the event of an emergency,such as when a transporter cannot deliver the PCB waste to the designateddisposer or commercial storer. e. <T3>Transporter andplusmin;1: Company name and EPA ID number. </T3>The nameand U.S. EPA 12 digit identification number of the initial transporterof the waste would be entered. f. <T3>Transporter andplusmin;2: Company name and EPA ID number. </T3>The nameand U.S. EPA 12 digit identification number of the second transporter,if applicable, would be entered. Space for additional intermediate transportersis provided on the continuation sheet for entry in the order they are used.g. <T3>Designated facility name, site address, and U.S. EPA ID number. </T3>Thegenerator would enter the name, site address, and EPA 12 digit identificationnumber of the off-site commercial storage or disposal facility which thegenerator has designated to receive its PCB waste. The site address isnecessary to inform the transporter where the shipment must be delivered.The designated facility should always be an approved facility for the disposalof PCBs, or an off-site commercial storage facility with either interimor final approval under andSection; 761.65(d). Ordinarily, transfer facilitiesand other temporary storage facilities used by transporters for storageof waste during ordinary transport would not be listed here as designatedfacilities, unless the PCB waste will remain in storage at such a sitefor greater than ten days. Likewise, an end user's own storage facilitywould not ordinarily be listed here as the designated facility, unlessthe laws of a State or local government require manifests for shipmentsbetween the generator's own facilities. h. <T3>Container number and type. </T3>The generator would indicate both thenumber of containers, and, using the instructions in Table 1 of the forminstructions, the type of containers for each shipment. i. <T3>U.S. DOT Description (Including: Proper shipping name, hazard class,and ID number). </T3>The generator would complete this section consistentwith DOT's regulations at 49 CFR 172.201. The generator would enter theassigned DOT identification number, which consists of a four-digit numberpreceded by the United Nations (UN) designation for PCBs. The generatorwould also enter here the total quantity and unit of measure (volume orweight) of the shipment. This measurement would be gross weight when thewaste container is to be discarded (e.g, a drum containing waste), andnet weight when it is not discarded (e.g., bulk shipments by tank truck).The quantity description would not include fractions. j. <T3>Special handling instructions and additional information_date of removalfrom service. </T3>This section would be used by the generator for severalpurposes. For example, ICC Bill of Lading information, placarding and markinginformation required by EPA or DOT, or emergency response telephone numbersmay be included on this space. However, the primary purpose of this spacefor the purpose of this proposed rule is to record the date of removalfrom service for the PCBs and PCB Items contained in the waste shipment.If this space is not adequate for entering all the relevant dates, thegenerator would attach a typewritten continuation sheet to the manifest.The continuation sheet would list the PCBs and PCB Items contained in theshipment and their dates of removal from service. k. <T3>Generator certification. </T3>The generator would be required to read,sign, and date the certification statement at the initiation of each wasteshipment. To the extent that the form requires a generator of PCB wasteto certify to waste minimization efforts, the requirement would be satisfiedas long as the generator has not increased the volume of waste by any actthat contravenes the dilution prohibition of the PCB disposal regulations.Generators who are ``excluded manufacturing processes'' or ``recycled PCBprocesses'' could certify as long as they are in compliance with the PCBrelease restrictions set forth for these processes at 40 CFR 761.3. l. <T3>Acknowledgment of acceptance by transporter. </T3>A transporter wouldbe required to acknowledge on the manifest the acceptance of the wasteshipment by signing the manifest and recording the date of acceptance.m. <T3>Discrepancy indication space. </T3>The Discrepancy Indication Spacewould be used for recording significant discrepancies, as defined below,between the PCB waste described on the manifest and the PCB waste actuallyreceived by the designated PCB storage or disposal facility. n. <T3>Acknowledgment of acceptance by designated facilities. </T3>The owneror operator of the designated commercial storage or disposal facility wouldbe required to acknowledge here the acceptance of the waste shipment bysigning the manifest and recording the date of acceptance. o. <T3>Optional information required by States. </T3>In addition, the UniformManifest form includes optional information spaces to meet the basic informationrequirements which States have the option of imposing. The optional Stateinformation items appear at the upper right portion of the manifest form,and they are shaded and headed by letters (rather than numbers) to setthem apart.<ITAG tagnum="81">5. Copies of the Form  </ITAG>EPA will not print copies or sets of the manifest form for public use.Generators and others needing copies of the form should first contact theirState office to determine if their State has printed copies available.If forms are not available from the State, camera-ready copies of the formfor printing purposes can be obtained from the State, or the EPA RegionalOffice, or EPA Headquarters. <ITAG tagnum="81">6. Use of the Manifest </ITAG>The manifest under RCRA consists of at least the number of copies whichwill provide the generator, each transporter, and the owner or operatorof the designated storage or disposal facility with one copy each for theirrecords, and another copy to be returned to the generator. EPA proposesthat manifests for PCB wastes under TSCA would also include sufficientcopies for the generator, the initial transporter, each intermediate transporter,the designated commercial storage or disposal facility, and another copyto be returned to the generator by the designated facility. In addition, this proposal would require that generators of PCB waste prepareone additional copy of the manifest. The generator would send this additionalcopy directly to the designated facility by Registered Mail, Return ReceiptRequested, immediately after the consignment of the waste to the initialtransporter. This advance manifest copy would be sent to the designatedfacility independently of the delivery of the waste. Under this proposal,the generator's obligation to send an advance copy of the manifest to thedesignated facility would be a non-delegable obligation which only thegenerator of PCB waste may perform. EPA is proposing this additional copy requirement on generators as a meansof ensuring further the integrity of the manifest system. As previouslyindicated, the GAO report on detection of illegal hazardous waste disposalactivities highlighted several instances in which transporters had forgedthe designated facility's copy of the manifest and returned it to the generator.The return of the forged copy signified to the generator that the wastehad arrived at the designated facility, when in fact, the transporter haddumped the waste or otherwise handled it improperly. The transporter profitedby retaining both the shipping fee and the disposal fee, rather than passingthe disposal fee on to the designated disposal facility. The submission of an advance copy of the manifest directly to the designatedfacility may deter transporters or brokers from acting improperly withrespect to the waste. Disposers and commercial storers would be alertedto expect the delivery of the waste, and generators would obtain a preliminaryverification (the signed Return Receipt) of the disposal arrangements fromthe designated facility that is independent of the transporter's efforts.EPA requests comment on the appropriateness and feasibility of this additionalverification requirement. Otherwise, the manifest system proposed here for PCB wastes parallels theoperation of the manifest under the RCRA tracking system for hazardouswaste. The generator would sign the manifest certification by hand, andobtain the handwritten signature of the initial transporter (who wouldhave an EPA ID Number) and the date of acceptance on all copies of themanifest. The generator would retain a copy of the manifest for its records,and give the remaining copies of the manifest to the initial transporter.The generator also would send by registered mail, return receipt requested,one advance copy of the manifest to the designated commercial storage ordisposal facility. The transporter then would carry the manifest with the waste to the designatedfacility. If delivery to the designated facility is not possible, the transporterwould contact the generator for further instructions, which would be enteredin the space provided for additional instructions. If intermediate transportersare involved, an additional copy of the manifest would be prepared by thegenerator for each additional transporter that will handle the waste. Theinitial transporter would deliver the entire quantity of waste to the designatedsubsequent transporter, and he would obtain the subsequent transporter'ssignature and the date of delivery on the manifest. A copy of the manifestwould be retained as a record by the initial transporter, and the remainingcopies would accompany the waste. The subsequent transporter would deliverthe entire quantity of waste to the designated storage or disposal facility,or to the next transporter, according to the instructions on the manifest.UntiI the signature of the designated facility or subsequent transporteris obtained, the waste would be considered to be in the custody of thetransporter who last signed the manifest. When the waste is finally delivered to the designated PCB storage or disposalfacility, the cwner or operator of the designated facility (or his agent)would sign and date each copy of the manifest to certify that the PCB wastecovered by the manifest was received at the facility. In addition, thedesignated facility would note on each copy of the manifest any significantdiscrepancies between the quantity or type of waste identified on the manifestand the quantity or type of waste received at its facility. For bulk waste,significant discrepancies would be variations greater than 10 percent inweight, and for batch waste, any variation in piece count, such as a discrepancyon one drum or other article in a truckload. Proposed significant discrepanciesin type are obvious differences which may be discovered by inspection oranalysis, such as when soil or other solids are substituted for liquids,or when waste greater than 500 ppm is substituted for waste below 500 ppm.The designated facility would keep one copy of the manifest for its records,and it would immediately give the transporter at least one copy of thesigned manifest. Within 30 days after the delivery, the designated facilitywould send a copy of the signed manifest to the generator at the mailingaddress indicated on the manifest. This transmission of the signed copyof the manifest to the generator would signify the proper completion ofthe disposal delivery transaction. Consistent with RCRA requirements, for shipments of PCB wastes within theUnited States solely by water (bulk shipments only), the generator wouldsend three copies of the manifest, dated and signed, to the owner or operatorof the designated PCB facility. Copies of the manifest would not be requiredfor each transporter. For shipments of PCB wastes by rail within the United States that originateat the site of generation, the generator would send at least three copiesof the manifest, dated and signed, to the next non-rail transporter, ifany, or the designated facililty, if transported solely by rail. The manifest requirements for shipments by rail or water are intended toparallel existing RCRA manifest requirements for these industries. Therail and water transporters were exempted from manifesting under RCRA toavoid confusion and duplication of effort, since both industries have theirown complex tracking systems that render additional tracking documentationunnecessary. The preparation of sufficient copies of the manifest would be the responsibilityof the generator who initiates the waste shipment. All copies of the manifestsupplied by the generator would be required to be legible; it would bea violation of these requirements to ship PCB wastes accompanied by a manifestor continuation sheet for which any copy or part is not legible. These proposed TSCA provisions for manifesting PCB wastes vary slightlyfrom the current RCRA manifest requirements. Promulgation of final TSCAmanifest requirements should in no way alter the existing RCRA manifestprovisions.<ITAG tagnum="81">7. Recordkeeping and Reporting </ITAG>While notification and manifesting requirements form the core of the wastetracking system, the tracking function is aided by several recordkeepingand reporting requirements. The Agency is proposing today that PCB wastehandlers comply with recordkeeping and reporting requirements which arebased largely upon the existing TSCA and RCRA requirements. a. <T3>Retention of manifests as records. </T3>The originator of the manifest(generator) would keep its copy of each manifest until it receives thesigned copy from the designated facility that received the PCB wastes.This signed copy would be retained as a record for at least 3 years fromthe date the PCB wastes were accepted by the initial transporter who tookthe PCB wastes off-site from the generator. If, however, the generatoris subject to the andSection; 761.180(a) annual document requirement, itwould retain its signed copies of manifests for the same period requiredunder andSection; 761.180(a) for its annual document records. The generatorwould retain its manifest records at the business location identified forrecords retention on its manifests. This location would also be the sitewhere the generator keeps its andSection; 761.180(a) annual documents, sincethe preparation of the annual documents will be aided to a great extentby manifest information. Likewise, the transporter would keep among its records a copy of the manifestsigned by the generator and either the next transporter, if applicable,or the commercial PCB storage or disposal facility that is designated forthe delivery of the waste. The transporter would retain this copy amongits records for at least 3 years from the date that the PCB wastes wereaccepted by the initial transporter. The owner or operator of the designated commercial storage or disposalfacility would likewise retain at its facility copies of its manifests.The manifest copies would be retained for the same periods as requiredunder andSection; 761.180(b) for the facility's annual document records.These records would be retained at the same location where the facilitymaintains its annual documents. In this notice, EPA solicits comments asto whether the 5-year record retention requirement for andSection; 761.180(a)and andSection; 761.180(b) should be changed to a 3-year recordkeeping requirement,which would conform with Paperwork Reduction Act guidelines. In addition, the Agency is proposing that the periods of retention formanifests by all PCB waste handlers be automatically extended during thecourse of any unresolved enforcement action regarding the regulated activity.b. <T3>Exception reporting. </T3>Following the RCRA model, today's proposalwould require Exception Reporting by all generators who must manifest theirPCB waste. Any time a generator does not receive a copy of the manifestsigned by the authorized representative of the designated storage or disposalfacility within 35 days of the date the waste was accepted by the initialtransporter, the generator would be required to contact the transporterand/or the owner or operator of the disposal facility to determine thestatus of the PCB wastes. If the problem is not reconciled within 45 daysfrom the date the waste was accepted by the initial transporter, the generatorwould file an Exception Report with the EPA Regional Administrator forthe Region in which the waste generation site is located. The ExceptionReport would be filed if the generator has not received within the prescribedperiod a copy of the manifest signed by the authorized representative ofthe designated facility. The Exception Report would include: (i) A legible copy of the manifest for which the generator does not haveconfirmation of delivery. (ii) A cover letter signed by the authorized representative of the generatorexplaining the efforts taken to locate the PCB wastes and the results ofthose efforts. EPA requests comments on this proposal to include Exception Reporting forPCB wastes. In particular, the Agency requests comments on whether thereshould be further tightening of the generator's recordkeeping requirementsto ensure that generators do in fact perform their essential oversightrole concerning the operation of the manifest system. The February, 1985GAO Report on problems with detection of illegal disposal of hazardouswaste found that there had been very few Exception Reports filed by generatorsunder RCRA. The GAO concluded that the infrequency with which ExceptionReporting has occurred is due largely to non-compliance by generators withthe requirement to match their filed manifest copies with the signed copiesthey later receive from commercial storers and disposers. The Report foundthat some generators were collecting both copies of the manifest, but notkeeping the copies in the same file locations, or otherwise physicallymatching the manifest copies. The GAO Report also suggested that the minisculenumber of Exception Reports may be attributed to a reluctance on the partof generators to ``turn in'' the low-bid transporters who haul away theirwaste. In this notice, EPA solicits comment as to whether the proposed recordkeepingand Exception Reporting requirements applicable to generators are adequateto ensure that the manifest system receives the attention from generatorsthat is necessary to keep the system credible. ShouId EPA substitute forthe proposal another option, such as one that would require the generatorsto attach the signed designated facility copy to the generator's originalcopy, and retain the matched copies in its files for 3 years as proof thatthe transaction was indeed verified? Should EPA require some other recordthat would demonstrate that the essential manifest matching role has infact been performed by generators. EPA requests comment on the proposedoption and the appropriateness of any alternative approach to generatorverification. c. <T3>One-year exception reporting. </T3>Indefinite storage of waste at approvedcommercial storage facilities is not an acceptable form of PCB waste management.Section 761.65(a) of the TSCA storage rules for PCB wastes limits the storageof PCB wastes prior to disposal to a period of l year. Under the Agency'sexisting compliance monitoring policies, the l-year storage period is allocatedbetween storage at approved disposal facilities and storage prior to receiptat the approved disposal facility. The initial generators of PCB waste(i.e., the PCB user, owner, or processor who first removes PCBs or PCBItems from service) are presumed to be in compliance with the 1-year limiton storage if they can show that the storage period prior to delivery toa disposal facility did not exceed 9 months. EPA is proposing today an additional tracking device that will facilitatethe Agency's ability to track compliance with the 1-year storage restrictionfor PCB wastes.First, generators would be required to record the dates when their PCBsor PCB Items were removed from service on the manifests that accompanytheir PCB wastes to commercial storage and disposal facilities. The datewhen PCBs were removed from service is an existing record requirement inthe andSection; 761.180(a) annual document for such generators. The proposalwould require that the date of removal from service for each PCB or PCBItem contained in a waste shipment be recorded on the section of the manifestreserved for ``Special Handling Instructions and Additional Information.''If this space is not adequate for entry of all the relevant dates, thegenerator would be required to attach to the manifest a typewritten continuationsheet containing this information. This information would then accompanythe waste until it reaches the designated facility, thereby providing noticeto waste handlers of the time by which lawful disposal must occur. When manifested PCB waste is received by commercial storers of PCB waste,the commercial storer would note the dates of removal from service in itsandSection; 761.180(b) records. At such time as the commercial storer initiatesa waste shipment containing the PCBs or PCB Items to another storage ordisposal facility, it would prepare a manifest which includes the datesof removal from service for the affected PCBs or PCB Items. In this manner,the PCB waste would ultimately arrive at an approved disposal facilityaccompanied by the essential information on removal from service. The disposerof PCB waste would then enter the date of removal from service for eachPCB or PCB Item among its andSection; 761.180(b) records, which also requirethe recording of the date of disposal. This proposal would require the submission of One-year Exception Reportsunder two types of circumstances. First, disposers would submit such ExceptionReports when they receive PCBs or PCB Items on a date more than 9 monthsafter their removal from service, as indicated on the manifest cover orcontinuation sheet, and because of other disposal commitments, the disposercannot (or has not been able to) dispose of the affected PCBs or PCB Itemswithin 1 year of their removal from service. Second, generators and commercial storers of PCB waste who transfer PCBsor PCB Items directly to disposers would file One-year Exception Reportsunder other circumstances. Such a Report would be submitted when the generatoror commercial storer has transferred PCBs or PCB Items to a disposer priorto the expiration of 9 months from their date of removal from service,but has not received a Certificate of Disposal confirming the disposalof the affected PCBs or PCB Items within 13 months of their removal fromservice. The proposal specifies a 13-month period in this instance outof recognition that disposers are allowed 30 days from the date of disposalto forward their Certificates of Disposal. So, generators or commercialstorers may receive confirmation of proper disposal as late as 1 year and30 days after the date the waste items were removed from service. Also,such an Exception Report would be required when a Certificate of Disposalconfirms a date of disposal for PCBs or PCB Items more than 1 year fromtheir removal from service. EPA requests comments on the requirement to submit ``One-year ExceptionReports'' in the manner proposed here. Is it feasible to require the datesof removal from service to be included on the manifest or on a separatecontinuation sheet attached to the manifest? Are there potential difficultiesassociated with commercial storers having to relay dates of removal fromservice from the manifests they receive to the manifests they prepare forthe waste shipments they later initiate? Are there alternatives that aremore feasible than the proposed option? For example, would it be more feasibleto let the return copy of the manifest signed by the disposal facilityserve as the Certificate of Disposal. Under this option, the disposer ofPCB waste would not return the signed copy of the manifest to the generatoruntil disposal of the waste has occurred, and the date of disposal wouldbe placed on the signed manifest copy. EPA requests comments on the relativemerits and drawbacks associated with the alternative options. d. <T3>Certificates of Disposal. </T3>EPA further proposes and requests commentson a requirement that disposal facilities prepare written Certificatesof Disposal. EPA is aware that many disposal facilities are already providingsuch certificates as a service to their PCB disposal clients. Such certificatesprovide assurances to PCB waste generators, who desire the certificatesto rebut any suggestions that they have not acted properly with respectto their PCB wastes. Generators of PCB wastes do not extinguish totallytheir potential liability for PCB disposal violations by entering intocontracts with disposers for disposal services. However, a document containingthe disposal facility's certification that disposal of specific wasteshas occurred may be relevant in establishing the good faith of the generator'sconduct. This proposal would make the Certificate of Disposal a uniform featureof the PCB disposal regulations. In addition to specifying the contentof a proper Certificate, this proposal would make the Certificate of Disposalthe final step in the PCB waste tracking system. In particular, the Certificateof Disposal would be returned by the disposal facility to the generatorsor commercial storers responsible for manifesting the waste shipment tothe disposer. While the disposer's return copy of the manifest confirmsonly the fact of arrival of PCB waste at a disposal facility, the Certificateof Disposal would confirm the fact of disposal itself. Thus, the Certificateof Disposal would be the final element in the tracking loop to ensure thatdisposal occurs within 1 year from the date that PCBs or PCB Items areremoved from service. The Certificate of Disposal would be the basis forOne-year Exception Reporting by generators and commercial storers, andit would remain as a record of disposal in the record collections of thedisposers and the facilities that receive them. e. <T3>Discrepancy reporting. </T3>Today's proposal would also require thatPCB commercial storage and disposal facilities that receive off-site shipmentsof PCB waste comply with a Discrepancy Reporting requirement. Manifestdiscrepancies are differences between the quantity or type of PCB wastesdesignated on the manifest and the quantity or type of PCB wastes thata designated facility actually receives. These discrepancies were describedabove in the discussion in unit IV.C.6. of this preamble dealing with theuse of the manifest. The Agency is proposing that, upon the discovery ofa significant discrepancy by a designated storage or disposal facility,the owner or operator of the designated facility would attempt to reconcilethe discrepancy with the appropriate party (e.g., generator or transporter).If the discrepancy is not resolved within 15 days after receiving the PCBwastes, the owner or operator of the designated facility would immediatelysubmit to the Regional Administrator in the Region where its facility islocated a letter describing the discrepancy and attempts to reconcile it,and a copy of the manifest at issue. The Agency requests comments about the appropriateness of the DiscrepancyReporting requirement as a component of the PCB waste tracking system.f. <T3>Unmanifested waste reporting. </T3>The Agency is also proposing toincorporate into this rule another feature of the RCRA tracking system_theUnmanifested Waste Report. This proposal would require a report from theowner or operator of a designated PCB storage or disposal facility wheneverthe designated facility receives from an off-site source any PCB wastesthat are subject to manifesting requirements but which are not accompaniedby the required manifest. This proposal would require the owner or operatorto submit a copy of the report to the Regional Administrator within 15days after receiving the waste. The Unmanifested Waste Report would includethe following information:i. The EPA identification number, name, and address of the designated facility.ii. The date the facility received the PCB waste. iii. The EPA identification number, name, and address of the generator,transporter, if available. iv. A description of the quantities and types of PCB waste included inthe unmanifested shipment. v. The method of storage or disposal for the PCB wastes. vi. The certification signed by the owner or operator of the designatedfacility or his authorized representative. vii. A brief explanation of why the PCB wastes were unmanifested, if known.EPA emphasizes that the preparation of an Unmanifested Waste Report shouldnot be a frequent event for these facilities, since this proposed regulationwould otherwise prohibit the acceptance by any transporter, off-site commercialstorer, or disposer of any unmanifested PCB waste for which these regulationsrequire a manifest to accompany the waste. g. <T3>Annual documents and reports. </T3>The existing PCB regulations imposeannual document requirements on facilities that use and store their ownPCBs or PCB Items (40 CFR 761.180(a)) and on disposal and storage facilities(40 CFR 761.180(b)). The users' annual documents provide a summary foreach calendar year of the amounts of PCBs that were either in use or designatedfor disposal, as well as information about where and when PCB wastes wereshipped. For the storage and disposal facilities, the annual document constitutesa summary of the types and quantities of PCB wastes received during theprevious calendar year, the sources of the waste, and the dates the wasteswere received and either disposed of at the facility or transferred toanother facility. The current regulations require each facility to haveavailable by July 1 of each year, the annual document summarizing the previouscalendar year's (January to December) PCB activity. The documents are currentlyretained at the facilities, and thus are only available to EPA during facilityinspections. EPA is proposing today several amendments to the annual document requirements.These amendments are intended to facilitate the tracking of PCB wastes,to foster consistency with the RCRA tracking system for hazardous wastes,and to provide EPA with up-to-date information on the quantities and typesof PCBs that are in service or in commerce for disposal. Significantly,the proposal would require that commercial storers and disposers of PCBwaste submit copies of their andSection; 761.180(b) annual documents by July15 of each year, to the Regional Administrator in the EPA Region wherethe facility is located. This proposal should have a minimal impact onthe regulated facilities. These facilities are already required to prepareand retain the documents on-site, and the only additional cost incurredunder this proposal would be the cost of copying the Report and mailingit to the Agency. These minimal costs are greatly outweighed by the valueof the information which EPA will have avaiIable each year and cumulativelyabout the PCB waste universe. i. <T3>Amendments to 40 CFR 761.180(a). </T3>The existing regulation at 40CFR 761.180(a) requires records and annual documents from certain facilitieswhich use or store at one time PCBs and PCB Items in amounts exceedingany of these thresholds: (1) 45 kilograms (99.4 pounds) of PCBs containedin PCB Containers; (2) one or more PCB Transformers; or (3) 50 or morePCB Large High or Low Voltage Capacitors. This provision applies both tothe PCB user's sites of use, and to the sites where the owner or user ofPCBs chooses to store its PCBs for use or disposal. The latter type ofstorage facility could be located at or contiguous to the site of use,or it could be located away from the site of use. The andSection; 761.180(a) annual document is a distinct written documentthat must be prepared by the owner or operator of the facility by July1 of each year, and it must summarize specific information about the previouscalendar year's PCB use and PCB waste activity. With regard to PCB waste,andSection; 761.180(a)(1) requires that the annual document include the dateswhen PCBs and PCB Items are removed from service, are placed into storagefor disposal, and are placed into transport for disposal. The quantitiesreported are required to be broken down by weight in kilograms of PCBsin any PCB Containers or PCB Transformers, as well as the number of PCBTransformers and PCB Large High or Low Voltage Capacitors. EPA proposes several amendments to 40 CFR 761.180(a). First, the annualdocument would be required to clearly identify the facility by name, owner,EPA identification number, and address. The owner or operator of multiplefacilities could still elect to keep the annual documents for all of itsfacilities at one facility which it designates and identifies at each facility.The owner or operator who elects to maintain all of its annual documentsat one facility is reminded that this option does not allow it to aggregateall of its use and storage data in one document; a distinct, written annualdocument would be prepared and maintained for each distinct facility. Also,where an owner or operator of multiple facilities designates one locationfor the retention of its annual documents, it would designate the samelocation identified as the location of its manifest records. Second, andSection; 761.180(a) would be amended so that the information requiredin the document includes the EPA identification number, name, and addressof each PCB disposal facility and commercial storage facility to whichPCB waste was shipped off-site during the year. This information wouldbe supplied for each PCB or PCB Item identified as removed from service.Third, the proposed amendments would also require that users who generatePCB wastes and transfer them directly to disposers record the date of disposalfor each PCB or PCB Item, as indicated on the Certificate of Disposal returnedto them by disposers of PCB waste. These generators would also keep copiesof the Certificates of Disposal among their andSection; 761.180(a) recordscollections, as an aid to verifying disposal and tracking violations ofthe 1-year limit on storage of PCB wastes. Also, the annual document would include the name and EPA identificationnumber of each transporter used during the calendar year for off site shipmentsof PCBs and PCB Items to disposal facilities or commercial storage facilities.EPA requests comment on the proposed amendments to the annual documentrequirements for the users of PCBs that generate and/or store their PCBwastes. EPA requests particular comments on the appropriateness of thenew information that would be required to be included in the annual documents,and the incremental burdens associated with the proposed amendments. ii. <T3>Amendments to 40 CFR 76l.180(b). </T3>The annual document requirementof andSection; 761.180(b) applies to the owners and operators of storagefacilities and approved PCB disposal facilities. The proposal would retainthe basic information requirements already specified at andSection; 761.180(b)for PCB wastes received at each disposal or storage facility. The proposedamendments would require several additional items of information to facilitatethe waste tracking function, and would rearrange the information requirementsinto groupings that would allow one to more easily track the storage anddisposal histories of specific PCBs and PCB Items handled as waste duringthe calendar year. First, the annual document would be required to clearly identify the disposalor storage facility by EPA identification number, name, owner, and address.The calendar year covered by the document would also be identified. Second, in identifying any facility (generator, commercial storer, otherdisposer) from which a PCB or PCB Item was received during the previouscalendar year, the facility would be identified by its name, owner, andEPA identification number. Third, where andSection; 761.180(b) currently requires the owner or operatorof a facility to identify any PCBs or PCB Items that were transferred toother storage or disposal facilities, the identification of the other storageor disposal facilities would include the facilities' names, addresses,and EPA identification numbers. The identity of the PCBs and PCB Itemstransferred would be clearly stated, along with the dates of the transfers.Fourth, facilities subject to andSection; 761.180(b) would record for eachPCB or PCB Item handled as waste during the calendar year the date of removalfrom service as indicated on the manifest cover or continuation sheet thataccompanied the waste when it was delivered to the facility. This recordentry would enable commercial storage facilities to reenter this importantinformation on the manifests which they prepare when the affected PCBsor PCB Items are later transferred to another storage or disposal facility.Disposal facilities would likewise enter the dates of removal from serviceamong their andSection; 761.180(b) records. These dates of removal from servicecould then be compared with the dates of disposal to determine compliancewith the l-year limit on storage of PCB wastes. These record entries, inaddition to the requirement to retain copies of Certificates of Disposal,would provide the basis for the submission of One-year Exception Reportsby commercial storers and disposers of PCB wastes. The proposed amendments to andSection; 761.180 are intended to clear up someof the ambiguity in the structure of the existing annual document requirementsthat apply to storage facilities. The existing regulation imposes an annualdocument requirement at andSection; 761.180(a) on PCB users, who are requiredto record information on both PCB use and storage at their facilities.Section 761.180(b), however, requires a distinct annual document to beprepared by storage and disposal facilities. Clearly, one annual documentshould suffice to summarize the PCB waste activities of the PCB users whostore their PCBs at their own facilities for disposal. However, the existingregulation is not clear in specifying which types of storage facilitiesare subject to andSection; 761.180(a), and which storage facilities are coveredunder andSection; 761.180(b). This proposal would clarify the scope of the annual document requirementsby limiting the coverage of andSection; 761.180(b) to disposal facilitiesand commercial storage facilities. The amendment proposed here would codifythe distinction between the PCB user's storage facilites (which are ``generatorsof PCB waste'') and commercial storage facilities that store PCB wastesowned by others. The user's storage sites would be subject only to andSection;761.180(a), whether the user chooses to store at or contiguous to the siteof use, or, at one of its storage facilities located off-site from thesite of use. The commercial storage facilities (``Commercial storers ofPCB waste'') would be subject to the andSection; 761.180(b) annual documentrequirements. Examples of the commercial storage facilities are storagefacilities owned or operated by disposers, transporters, waste brokers,and electrical equipment service companies that drain PCBs from equipmentwhich others own. The annual document required of commercial storage and disposal facilitiesunder andSection; 761.180(b) would be a distinct written document which summarizesthe facilities' PCB waste activities during the previous calendar year(January to December). The document would be prepared by July 1 of eachyear, and under this proposal, storage and disposal facilities would berequired to submit a copy of their annual documents to the Regional Administratorby no later than July 15 of each year. The obligation to submit annualdocuments would continue until the submission of the annual document forthe calendar year during which the facility ceases PCB storage or disposaloperations. Because some data contained in these annual documents may qualify as TSCACBI, this proposal would require that submitters follow the proceduresset forth at 40 CFR 704.7 for asserting CBI claims with respect to theirannual documents. Significantly, these procedures would require the submissionof a complete copy (for internal use) indicating those parts claimed tobe CBI, and a second copy from which any material alleged to be CBI hasbeen deleted. EPA requests comments on the proposed amendments to the andSection; 761.180(b)annual document requirements, and the proposal to require their submissionto the Regional Administrators. Where the proposed requirement to submitannual documents is concerned, the Agency requests comment on the meritsof a mandatory, automatic submission requirement versus an option underwhich annual documents would be submitted to EPA upon request. D. Approvals for Commercial Storers of PCB Wastes <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Background </ITAG>The existing PCB storage and disposal regulations do not contain any permittingor approval authority for commercial PCB storage facilities. This situationhas been the subject of Congressional criticism, particularly as it relatesto the brokers and other intermediate handlers of PCB wastes who engagein off-site, commercial storage of PCB waste prior to the delivery of thewaste to approved disposal facilities. Also, in the case of the storageareas associated with approved PCB disposal facilities, there are not inplace specific approval conditions and closure plans relating to theircommercial storage operations.While the commercial storers of PCB wastes are subject to the storage facilityrequirements of 40 CFR 761.65, they are not subject to the additional oversightthat is possible through an approval process, which would enable the Agencyto both pass on the qualifications of the facility's principals, and imposeappropriate facility standards in the facility's conditions of approval.Particularly, there is no practical means by which EPA may grant or withholdauthority to conduct commercial storage operations on the basis of a facility'sability to properly close its commercial PCB storage sites, or to ensurethat adequate funds will be available to meet the anticipated closure costs.Likewise, the ability of such facilities to operate outside of a permittingprocess eliminates the permit revocation and suspension sanctions whichmay operate as deterrents to regulatory and permit violations. Under thesecircumstances, facilities which fail can and have become the subject ofremedial actions that require the expenditure of public funds, rather thanthe funds of those responsible for establishing and operating the facilities.EPA can no longer countenance these circumstances.The August 13, 1986 hearings before the Subcommittee on Environment, Energy,and Natural Resources highlighted the shortcomings in EPA's ability tooversee effectively the activities of the commercial storers of PCB wasteunder the existing regulations. These proceedings culminated with the enactmentby the House of Representatives of a bill that would require an approvalprocess for intermediate handlers of PCB wastes, and compliance by eachapproved facility with financial assurance requirements that currentlyapply only to RCRA hazardous waste treatment, storage, and disposal facilities.This proposal incorporates an approval mechanism for commercial storersthat would enable the Agency to evaluate the qualifications and financialresponsibility of those entities who engage in the commercial storage ofPCB wastes. On the effective date of the final rule, the existing ``commercialstorers of PCB wastes'' would be deemed to have interim approvals to conductstorage activities. The interim authorization would expire 180 days afterthe rule's effective date, unless the owner or operator of the commercialstorage facility has applied for a final approval prior to the expirationof the 180-day period. For a facility that files a timely application,the period of interim approval would be extended until such time as EPAdetermines to grant or deny the application for final approval.The commercial storer who applies for final approval would be requiredto demonstrate to the Regional Administrator that it is qualified to operatea storage facility in accordance with the PCB storage requirements of andSection;761.65. In passing upon an applicant's qualifications, the relevant considerationswould include not only the technical qualifications of the principals,but also the previous experience (including any enforcement history) ofthe principals in connection with any PCB waste handling or hazardous wasteactivity. Also, andSection; 761.65(d) would require that a commercial storerof PCB waste prepare an acceptable closure plan for its storage facility,and that it demonstrate the financial resources necessary to close thefacility in accordance with its closure plan. The content of closure plansand the necessary demonstration of financial responsibility are set outin proposed paragraphs (e), (f), and (g) of andSection; 761.65.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. </ITAG><T3>Closure Plans</T3>Closure refers to the period in a facility's existence that begins whenwastes are no longer accepted for storage, and during which the ownersor operators of the storage facility are required to remove all PCB wastefrom the facility and decontaminate their equipment, structures, and property.Under this proposal, facility owners or operators would be required toprepare detailed closure plans that identify the steps necessary to bringabout final closure. The closure plan will be an essential condition ofapproval for those facilities that apply for and receive a final storageapproval. These closure plans would identify in detail the means the facilitywill use to close in a manner that will eliminate or minimize the post-closureescape of PCBs to the environment.The preparation of a detailed closure plan is necessary to ensure thatowners and operators analyze their future closure responsibilities andbring their present operating practices into line with those responsibilities.Further, a detailed closure plan is essential to ensure accurate cost estimatesand adequate financial assurance. Experience with closure plans under RCRAhas instructed the Agency that poorly detailed plans have been accompaniedby inadequate cost estimates. Thus, acceptable closure plans would be requiredto contain sufficient detail so that a third party could conduct closurein accordance with the plan in the event the owner or operator fails todo so.The closure plan contents specified in this proposal are derived from theRCRA experience and regulations. The RCRA closure plan standards were firstpublished on January 12, 1981 (46 FR 2851), and amended in regulationsissued by EPA and published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> on May 2, 1986 (51 FR 16422). The 1986 amendmentswere a response to litigation and several years experience under the existingSubpart G closure standards of 40 CFR Parts 264 and 265. The purpose ofthe 1986 amendments was to clarify the required content of closure plansfor RCRA facilities. EPA believes that the revised RCRA closure plan standardsare an appropriate framework for the closure plan standards that this proposalwould require as part of the TSCA approval process for commercial storersof PCB wastes.The core requirements of acceptable closure plans are specified in andSection;761.65(e)(1). The closure plan would describe with particularity the meansby which the PCB storage areas of the facility will be closed in a mannerthat eliminates the potential for post-closure releases of PCBs to theenvironment which would present unreasonable risks. This threshold requirementis essentially the performance standard that governs all closure operations.Closure may occur with respect to the entire facility or with respect todistinct storage areas contained in the facility. Where distinct storageareas are closed, but not an entire storage facility, the closure is referredto as partial closure.Second, the extent of projected PCB storage activities during the facility'sactive life would be identified. The active life of a facility would extenduntil the time when the completion of closure is certified to the RegionalAdministrator under andSection; 761.65(e)(7). For each PCB storage area, and the facility overall, the owner or operatorwould identify the extent of PCB storage that will occur relative to otherwastes, and the maximum projected inventory of PCB wastes that will everbe handled at one time. This information is essential, because it bearsupon the facility being able to demonstrate that it in fact has the capacityto store PCB wastes in accordance with the andSection; 761.65 storage requirements.Further, the maximum projected inventory of PCB wastes forms the basisfor designating a maximum rated storage capacity for the facility, andfor estimating the costs of closure. Financial assurance would be demonstratedin an amount sufficient to close the facility when closure costs wouldbe at a maximum, and that eventually would usually correspond to the maximumallowed inventory of stored PCB waste. Third, the facility owner or operator would identify in detail the methodsand arrangements that will be used during closure for actually removingPCB waste from the facility, and providing for its transportation off-siteto other commercial storage or disposal facilities. The commercial storerof PCB waste that removes PCBs in accordance with its closure plan wouldthen be a generator of PCB waste. Fourth, the closure plan would identify with particularity the steps thatthe owner or operator will follow during closure to remove PCB residuespresenting unreasonable risks from the facility's equipment and structures,as well as to remove residual PCBs, if any, from the soil surrounding thefacility. Unlike RCRA closure plans, where decontamination goals and samplingmethods are to be developed as elements of the closure plan, the commercialstorer of PCB waste under TSCA would identify the steps needed (cleanupmethods, cleanup goals, sampling methods) to accomplish compliance withthe risk-based, nationwide PCB Spills Cleanup Policy, which EPA issuedfor publication in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of April 2, 1987 (52 FR 10688). This descriptionwould include any other activities, e.g., ground-water monitoring, run-onand run-off control, facility security, that will be necessary during closureto ensure compliance with the closure performance standard. In addition, for each andSection; 761.65(b) PCB storage area at a commercialstorage facility, the closure plan would include a schedule for closurethat identifies the total time required to complete closure, and the timerequired for the various intervening activities entailed by final closure.If a closure trust fund is selected by the facility as its financial assurancemechanism, the closure plan would identify the expected year that finalclosure will occur. This requirement would bear upon the calculating ofthe ``pay-in'' period for funding the trust, since trust funds would befunded in annual installments paid into the trust each year until the yearof closure. Finally, the proposal includes provisions specifying the criteria and proceduresfor modifying a facility's closure plan, which action may be initiatedby either the facility owner or operator, or, the Regional Administratorwhen cause exists to believe that changed circumstances will affect theclosure plan, the time for closure, or the closure costs. The changed circumstancesthat would justify a closure plan modification are discribed at 40 CFR761.65(e) (3) and (4). The proposal also includes a timetable for when certain closure eventsmust occur and when required notices must be given. Generally, the commencementof closure would be preceded by written notice to the Regional Administratorat least 60 days prior to the date when final closure is expected to begin.The date when closure is expected to begin would ordinarily be no laterthan 30 days after the receipt of the last shipment of PCB waste for storageat the facility. This date could be extended for good cause. The timetable in andSection; 761.65(e)(5) would require that all PCB wastesthat were in commercial storage at the facility be removed in accordancewith the closure plan within 90 days of the receipt of the last quantitiesof PCB waste. All closure activities would be completed within 180 days,and the facilities would certify the completion of closure (or partialclosure) in a written notice to the Regional Administrator within 60 daysof the date that closure is completed. The certification that closure hasbeen completed in accordance with the closure plan would be signed by anindependent professional engineer, as well as the facility's owner or operator.The deadlines in andSection; 761.65(e)(5) would be extended by the RegionalAdministrator for reasonable periods where good cause for the delay isshown. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. </ITAG><T3>Financial Assurance of Closure </T3>The proposal includes at andSection; 761.65(f) a procedure for preparinga written estimate of the cost in current dollars of closing the PCB storageareas of the facility in accordance with the closure plan. The currentclosure cost estimate which would be kept at the facility is the closurecost estimate adjusted annually for the effects of inflation and any approvedmodifications to the closure plan. The closure cost estimate would assumethat closure occurs during that point in time when the closure costs wouldbe most expensive, and it would assume closure by a third party not relatedto the commercial storer, using current market costs for disposal, storage,and decontamination. The proposal would require that the commercial storers of PCB waste demonstratefinancial responsibility for closure by passing specific financial testsor by acquiring specific financial instruments that will make availableadequate funds to meet the closure cost estimates. The proposal would allowowners or operators to choose from a number of mechanisms, including trustfunds, surety bonds, letters of credit, corporate guarantees, insurancepolicies, as well as the financial test. The Agency believes that thereis ample justification for imposing these requirements, based upon theseveral instances in which facilities that have gone out of business orthat have been forced to close have been found not to have sufficient resourcesat the time of closure to provide for adequate cleanup. If the expenditureof public resources is to be avoided, it is incumbent that owners and opertorsof approved facilities make provision for closure funds during the activelife of their facilities. In this notice, EPA is proposing that closure plans and financial assurancerequirements be established for all commercial PCB storage facilities andstorage facilities of permitted PCB disposers. This provision assures thepublic that cleanup can be achieved after closure of the facility. EPAsolicits comments on whether closure plans and financial assurance requirementsare necessary, particularly since the manifest system included in thisregulation will provide a means to track the generation and transfer ofPCBs (including the length of time held in storage) and may provide anincentive for generators to ensure the proper and timely disposal of PCBs.Generators should recognize this incentive, since they could be held responsiblefor the cleanup costs at abandoned sites. EPA also solicits comments on:(1) Any information and data on the costs and impacts of these provisions,particularly on small commercial storage facilities; and (2) what alternativesto these provisions may exist to ensure cleanup of abandoned sites (e.g.,requiring storage facilities to disclose closure and financial plans duringcontract negotiations. The financial assurance mechanisms proposed today for commercial storersof PCB wastes are essentially the same as the mechanisms allowed underRCRA regulations at Subpart H of 40 CFR Parts 264 and 265. The developmentof these mechanisms and the specifics of their operation have been discussedin numerous RCRA-related rule documents which EPA has issued and publishedin the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. The reader is referred to the following <T4>Federal Register</T4> documents for a detailed discussion of thesemechanisms: 45 FR 33260 (May 19, 1980); 46 FR 2821 (January 12, 1981);47 FR 15032 (April 7, 1982); and 51 FR 16422 (May 2, 1986). For brevity,this preamble provides only a brief description of the proposed financialmechanisms, with particular attention to any changes from the RCRA mechanisms.Comments may, however, address EPA's reasoning in adopting the financialresponsibility requirements included in the cited <T4>Federal Register</T4> documents. i. <T3>Financial test. </T3>The financial tests consist of criteria that comparethe closure cost estimate to specific ratios composed of net worth, netincome, total liabilities, current assets and liabilities, net workingcapital, and current bond issuance ratings. Once the elements are identifiedin the firm's financial statements, the calculation of the test ratiosis straightforward. The demonstration is presented in a letter from thefirm's chief financial officer, which would be supported by reports fromthe firm's independent certified public accountant. The financial testis not intended as a test of potential insolvency; rather, it is designedto ensure that those who pass the test will have adequate resources toestablish one of the alternative forms of assurance should he later failthe test.EPA here proposes the same financial test criteria that are currently ineffect for hazardous waste facilities under 40 CFR 264.143(f). Also, thedemonstration of financial assurance would be satisfied by a letter fromthe firm's chief financial officer containing wording similar to that specifiedat 40 CFR 264.151(f). The only variations proposed from the RCRA requirementsare language changes intended only to make the provisions conform to TSCAstatutory and regulatory authorities.The financial test mechanism would be satisfied when a parent corporationwhich meets the test's criteria guarantees that it will perform closureor establish a closure trust fund in the event that its subsidiary corporationfails to perform in accordance with its closure plan. In addition to meetingthe financial test criteria, the guarantor corporation would submit a writtencorporate guarantee with the wording specified at 40 CFR 264.151(h), modifiedonly to conform to the TSCA statutory and regulatory authorities.ii. <T3>Closure trust fund. </T3>Under this mechanism, the owner or operatorof the commercial PCB storage facility would enter into a written trustagreement appointing a trustee to manage a fund established by the owneror operator for the benefit of EPA. The fund would be established to meetthe costs of closure, and the trust instrument would set forth the powersand obligations of the trustee with respect to the management and use ofthe fund. When instructed by the Regional Administrator, the trustee wouldreimburse the owner or operator, or other persons, for expenditures madein closing the facility, in the amounts directed by the Regional Administrator.The ``corpus'' of the trust would consist of the annual payments whichthe owner or operator makes to the fund during the ``pay-in'' period, andthese amounts would be invested or otherwise managed by the trustee.EPA proposes here that owners or operators of commercial PCB storage facilitiesmay satisfy their financial assurance obligations by establishing a closuretrust fund under the conditions described in 40 CFR 264.143(a), utilizinga trust instrument with the wording specified at 40 CFR 264.151(a). Thisproposal would modify the RCRA language to the extent of conforming itto TSCA statutory and regulatory authorities.In addition, EPA proposes that the ``pay-in'' period for commercial storersof PCB waste be limited to a period not exceeding 3 years. This proposed``pay-in'' period differs from the ten-year period used under RCRA becauseof the difference between the types of storage facilities regulated underRCRA and under this rule. Under RCRA, storage facilities for the managementof hazardous wastes can include land disposal units (e.g., landfills orsurface impoundments), while under the TSCA PCB rules, PCB storage facilitiesare places where PCB Articles and PCB Containers are kept for less thanone year prior to disposal. RCRA trust funds allow for an extended pay-inperiod because of a concern for the substantial costs associated with suchmeasures as capping and securing the facility at closure, as well as thecontinuing costs of conducting long-term ground water monitoring for aclosed landfill or surface impoundment. In the case of closing a PCB storagearea, however, One need not take into account the post-closure care associatedwith these types of land disposal units. Once the PCB storage facilityhas been closed, there are no long-term costs. Thus, there is no compellingcase for extending the ``pay-in'' period for the 10 or more years allowedfor ``pay-in'' under RCRA, and the Agency believes that 3 years representsa sufficient period of time to fund a commerical storage facility's closuretrust fund. EPA solicits comments on this proposed three-year pay-in periodfor closure trust funds. EPA requests comments as well on the relativemerits of an alternative option that would adopt the RCRA ten-year closuretrust pay-in period for PCB storage facilities' closure trust funds.iii. <T3>Surety bonds. </T3>This proposal also incorporates two additional RCRAfinancial assurance mechanisms that allow surety companies to act as guarantorsof closure obligations. The first is a surety bond that guarantees thepayment of the ``penal sum of the bond'' into a standby closure trust fund,in the event the owner or operator of the facility fails to perform theguaranteed closure obligations. The second is a surety bond under whichthe surety company guarantees that upon the owner's or operator's breachof its closure obligations, it will either perform closure as guaranteedby the bond, or, deposit the amount of the ``penal sum of the bond'' intoa standby trust fund.EPA proposes here that commercial storers of PCB waste under TSCA may satisfytheir financial assurance obligations by obtaining surety bonds conformingto the requirements of either 40 CFR 264.143(b) (guaranteeing payment intotrust funds) or 40 CFR 264.143(c) (guaranteeing performance of closure).The only modifications proposed to the RCRA language are those necessaryto cause the requirements and instruments to conform to TSCA statutoryand regulatory authorities.iv. <T3>Closure letter of credit. </T3>Consistent with andSection; 264.143(d)and andSection; 264.151(d) of the RCRA regulations, EPA proposes that commercialstorers of PCB waste under TSCA may choose to demonstrate financial assurancefor closure by obtaining an irrevocable letter of credit from their bankor other financial institution. The irrevocable letter of credit instrumentassures that the financial institution that issues it will make availablea specific sum of money over a specific time period on behalf of its customer(the facility owner or operator) for the benefit of the party in whosefavor the letter is written. The beneficiary can draw on the credit bypresenting the sight drafts or other documents specified in the letter.Under this proposal, the financial institution would issue the letter infavor of the appropriate Regional Administrator, and the facility owneror operator would establish the account in the amount of the current closurecost estimate. The funds would be paid into a standby closure trust fundfrom which closure expenditures would be reimbursed.EPA proposes that irrevocable letters of credit for closure under TSCAwould comply with the requirements specified for these instruments underRCRA, modified only to the extent of causing them to conform to TSCA statutoryand regulatory authorities.v. <T3>Closure insurance. </T3>To the extent such insurance is available tocover PCB storage facilities' closure obligations, EPA proposes to allowclosure insurance, as decribed at 40 CFR 264.143(e), as another means ofsatisfying today's proposed financial responsibility obligations underTSCA. The proposal includes only those modifications to the andSection; 264.143(e)and andSection; 264.151(e) language as are necessary to cause the requirementsto conform with TSCA statutory and regulatory authorities. As requiredunder RCRA, the face amount of the policy would equal at least the currentclosure cost estimate, and the policy would guarantee the availabilityof funds up to the face amount to cover closure expenditures. The insurerwould reimburse persons who present itemized bills to the Regional Administratorfor closure expenditures which are determined by the Regional Administratorto be in accordance with the closure plan or otherwise justified.vi. <T3>Combination of mechanisms. </T3>Under today's proposal, the owner oroperator of a commercial PCB storage facility could meet its financialassurance obligations by establishing more than one mechanism for his facility.The combination would be limited to trust funds, letters of credit, andinsurance policies, and surety bonds guaranteeing payment into trusts.The combined instruments would meet the financial responsibility requirementsof TSCA if the combination of mechanisms provides financial assurance inan amount at least equalling the current closure cost estimate. The RegionalAdministrator could look to any or all of the instruments to provide forclosure of the facility.E. Relationship to State LawUnlike the RCRA program for hazardous wastes, the TSCA section 6(e)(1)disposal program for PCB wastes is fundamentally a Federal program, administeredby the EPA Regional Administrators and the Assistant Administrator forPesticides and Toxic Substances. The enforcement of the Federal programhas been delegated to the Regional Administrators, while the authorityto issue approvals for PCB disposal processes is currently shared by theRegional Administrators and the Assistant Administrator for Pesticidesand Toxic Substances. At the same time, the States may concurrently regulatePCB disposal within their jurisdictions, without supplanting the Federalrequirements. To date, at least 18 States have elected to regulate variousaspects of PCB disposal, often pursuant to their authorized RCRA hazardouswaste programs.A major component of this proposed rule is the requirement imposed on certaingenerators, transporters, commercial storers, and disposers of PCB wasteto notify EPA of their PCB waste handling activities and obtain identificationnumbers to use on their manifests and other records. This TSCA requirementwould be independent of any requirement under state or local law or undera state-administered RCRA program. Thus, a generator exempt from the notificationrequirements imposed by this proposed rule may be independently requiredto obtain and use a unique identification number by a state or local government.Any such state or local requirement would not be preempted by these Federalrequirements.Persons subject to this proposed rule and to state-administered RCRA programswould be able to use the same identification number for the manifestingand recordkeeping requirements of both programs. The identification numbersto be used under this proposed rule, as well as those used under state-administeredRCRA programs, are the Dun and Bradstreet Data Universal Numbering (DUN)system numbers. Persons subject to notification under this proposed rulewho have already been issued an identification number under a state-administeredRCRA program would be required to supply EPA with the previously issuednumber in their TSCA notifications. EPA will verify that these numbersare unique and conform to the DUN system, and authorize as far as possiblethe use for TSCA purposes of previously issued identification numbers.Under this process, regulated persons will benefit from the administrativeconvenience of using the same number for both state and TSCA purposes.EPA will issue such persons a distinct TSCA identification number onlyin those cases where a previously issued number does not conform to theDUN system, or is not unique.This rule also requires PCB waste handlers to comply with manifesting requirementsfor the regulated PCB wastes which they handle. This proposed rule wouldutilize the RCRA Uniform Manifest to facilitate implementation of thisrequirement throughout the United States. The Uniform Manifest includesoptional information spaces to meet basic information requirements whichstates have the option of imposing. The optional state information itemsappear at the upper right portion of the manifest form, and they are shadedand headed by letters (rather than numbers) to set them apart.As required by Department of Transportation (DOT) regulations issued undersection 112 of the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, 49 U.S.C. 1811(a),states are not permitted to require any information on the space of theUniform Manifest specified for ``special handling instructions and additionalinformation,'' on the back of the form, or on any continuation sheet, asa condition of transportation.Since PCB waste generators may obtain pre-printed or camera-ready copiesof the Uniform Manifest from State agencies, it should be noted that theinstructions which may accompany these manifests may not reflect all therequirements which EPA may include in the final rule. Specifically, thefollowing elements of the proposed PCB waste tracking system under TSCAwould not be covered on the pre-printed instructions accompanying the UniformManifest: (1) The transmittal by the generator (registered mail, returnreceipt requested) of an advance copy of the manifest to the commercialstorer or disposer of PCB wastes; (2) One-Year Exception Reporting andthe related requirement to note dates of removal from service of PCBs andPCB Items on manifests; and (3) requirements related to Certificates ofDisposal for PCB wastes.It is essential that all PCB waste handlers understand fully any deviationsfrom the RCRA tracking requirements that appear in the final rule, sincereliance upon pre-printed instructions issued by states with the UniformManifest will not excuse the responsibility to comply fully with TSCA requirementsfor PCB wastes.This proposed rule also would impose new TSCA approval requirements forcommercial storers of PCB wastes who store PCB wastes owned or generatedby others at storage facilities subject to Federal facility standards specifiedat 40 CFR 761.65. The proposed rule would require, among other things,that commercial storers of PCB wastes develop closure plans and financialresponsibility mechanisms similar to those required of facilities whichmanage hazardous waste under RCRA. In those states which regulate PCB storageand disposal practices under their state-administered RCRA programs, thenew TSCA approval requirements for commercial storers would be independentof the state requirements. Thus, the fact that a facility storing PCB wastescommercially may have a RCRA permit or RCRA interim status would not excusethe requirement to obtain a Federal approval to store PCB wastes commercially.Likewise, the fact that such a facility is aleady covered by a state'sRCRA closure plan and financial responsibility requirements would not excusethe new TSCA requirements to develop closure plans and demonstrate financialresponsibility for closure. However, the burden of these concurrent Stateand Federal approval requirements should be mitigated, since in many cases,compliance with the RCRA closure and financial responsibility standardsshould be highly persuasive evidence of compliance with the similiar TSCAapproval standards.F. Economic ImpactEPA analyzed the economic impacts associated with the notification, manifesting,recordkeeping and reporting, and storage approval requirements proposedin this rulemaking. The Regulatory Impact Analysis is available for reviewin the public docket. This unit will summarize the economic impacts ofcompliance with the provisions of the proposed rule, as presented in theRegulatory Impact Analysis. EPA welcomes comments regarding the economicimpacts of this proposed rule.<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Notification</ITAG>This rule proposes that storers, transporters, and disposers handling PCBsat concentrations at or above 50 ppm must notify EPA of their PCB activities.EPA estimates that 5,651 facilities will be required to notify the Agencyat a cost to industry of $290,000.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Manifesting</ITAG>In development of the proposed manifest requirements, EPA consulted withStates which regulate PCB disposal and with the operators of TSCA approveddisposal facilities. EPA found that each of the approved disposal facilitiesrequired a manifest to accompany any shipment of regulated PCB waste, regardlessof PCB concentration. These disposal firms require manifests for the PCBwaste they accept as a means of preserving records of firms potentiallyresponsible for contributing toward any remedial actions which might ariseat the disposal site.Also, among the 18 states that currently require a manifest to accompanyPCB wastes, all but one require a manifest for wastes containing PCBs atthe 50 to 500 ppm level. Because current practice appears to be consistentwith the proposed 50 ppm trigger for manifesting, there would not appearto be a significant incremental burden to industry associated with theproposed option.<ITAG tagnum="81">3. Submission of Annual Reports</ITAG> EPA currently requires that annual reports be maintained by generators,storers, and disposal firms handling PCB wastes. This proposal requirescommercial storers (as defined under section 761.3) and disposers handlingPCBs at concentrations at or above 50 ppm to submit these annual reportsto the Agency. The number of firms expected to comply with this provisionof the proposed rule is 130. The incremental costs of submitting thesereports to the Agency is estimated to be minimal.<ITAG tagnum="81">4. Storage Approvals</ITAG> EPA is also proposing that all commercial storers of PCB wastes obtainEPA approval. To obtain approval, commercial storage firms must, amongother things, develop closure plans for their facilities and meet financialassurance requirements. EPA estimates that the cost to industry for the development and submissionof the closure plan and cost of closure will be $35,000 for a facilitythat is not permitted under RCRA and $25,000 for a facility with a RCRApermit. EPA estimates that the costs for financial assurance to be about $270,000per typical facility. A typical facility was assumed to have a laboratory,a truck facility, a storage building, and two storage tanks.<ITAG tagnum="81">5. Total Economic Impacts</ITAG> EPA esimates that the total costs to industry associated with this proposedrule would be between $23.28 million and $23.37 million, of which, $22.85million represents the total cost to industry of complying with the proposedapproval requirements for commercial storers of PCB wastes. EPA also estimatesthat the total costs to the U.S. Government would be between $0.85 millionand $1.37 million.<ITAG tagnum="84">V. Hearing Procedures</ITAG>If persons request time for oral comment, EPA will hold informal hearingsin Washington, DC. Any informal hearing will be conducted in accordancewith EPA's ``Procedures for Conducting Rulemaking Under section 6 of theToxic Substances Control Act'' (40 CFR Part 750). Persons or organizationsdesiring to participate in the informal hearing must file a written requestto participate. The written request to participate must be sent to theTSCA Assistance Office at the address listed under <T2>``FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT.''</T2> The written request to participatemust include: (1) A brief statement of the interest of the person or organizationin the proceeding; (2) a brief outline of the points to be addressed; (3)an estimate of the time required; and (4) if the request comes from anorganization, a nonbinding list of the persons to take part in the presentation.Organizations are requested to bring with them, to the extent possible,employees with individual expertise in and responsibility for each of theareas to be addressed. Organizations which do not file main comments inthe rulemaking will not be allowed to participate at the hearing, unlessthe Record and Hearing Clerk grants a waiver of this requirement in writing.The date for the hearing and the date for the receipt of the written requestto participate in the hearing are set forth in the ``<T2>DATES</T2>'' section of the preamble to this document.<ITAG tagnum="84">VI. Official Rulemaking Record</ITAG>In accordance with the requirements of section 19(a)(3) of TSCA, EPA isissuing the following list of documents, which constitutes the record ofthis proposed rulemaking. This record includes basic information consideredby the Agency in developing this proposal, including appropriate <T4>Federal Register</T4> notices, reports prepared by the General AccountingOffice (GAO), testimony from Congressional committee hearings, communicationsbefore proposal, and economic analyses of the proposal and other regulatoryoptions. A supplementary list or lists may be published any time on orbefore the date the final rule is issued.A full list of these materials is available for inspection and copyingin the TSCA Public Docket Office. However, any Confidential Business Information(CBI) that is a part of the record for this rulemaking is not availablefor public review. A public version of the record, from which CBI has beendeleted, is available for inspection.<ITAG tagnum="73">A. Previous Rulemaking Records</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Official Rulemaking Record from ``Polychlorinated Biphenyls (PCBs);Disposal and Marking Rule,'' Docket No. OPTS-68005, 43 FR 7150, February17, 1978.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Official Rulemaking Record from ``Polychlorinated Biphenyls (PCBs);Manufacturing, Processing, Distribution in Commerce, and Use ProhibitionsRule,'' 44 FR 31514, May 31, 1979.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Official Rulemaking Record from ``Polychlorinated Biphenyls (PCBs);Manufacturing, Processing, Distribution in Commerce, and Use Prohibitions;Use in Electrical Equipment,'' Docket No. OPTS-62015, 47 FR 37342, August25, 1982. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Official Rulemaking Record from ``Polychlorinated Biphenyls (PCBs);Manufacturing, Processing, Distribution in Commerce, and Use Prohibitions;Exclusions, Exemptions, and Use Authorizations,'' Docket No. OPTS-62032A,49 FR 28172, July 10, 1984. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Official Rulemaking Record from ``Polychlorinated Biphenyls (PCBs);Manufacturing, Processing, Distribution in Commerce, and Use Prohibitions;Use in Electrical Transformers,'' Docket No. OPTS-62035D, 50 FR 29170,July 17, 1985. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">B. Federal Register Notices</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) 43 FR 7150, February 17, 1978, USEPA, ``Polychlorinated Biphenyls(PCBs); Disposal and Marking.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) 43 FR 31514, May 31, 1979, USEPA, ``Polychlorinated Biphenyls(PCBs); Manufacturing, Processing, Distribution in Commerce, and Use Prohibitions.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) 47 FR 37342, August 25, 1982, USEPA, ``Polychlorinated Biphenyls(PCBs); Manufacturing, Processing, Distribution in Commerce, and Use Prohibitions;Use in Electrical Equipment.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) 49 FR 28172, July 10, 1984, USEPA, ``Polychlorinated Biphenyls(PCBs); Manufacturing, Processing, Distribution in Commerce, and Use Prohibitions;Exclusions, Exemptions, and Use Authorizations.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) 50 FR 19170, July 17, 1985, USEPA, ``Polychlorinated Biphenylsin Electrical Transformers; Final Rule.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) 52 FR 10688, April 2, 1987, USEPA, ``Polychlorinated BiphenylsSpill Cleanup Policy.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) 43 FR 29908, July 11, 1978, ``Preliminary Notification of HazardousWaste Activities; Proposed Procedures.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) 43 FR 58946, December 18, 1978, USEPA, ``Hazardous Waste; ProposedGuidelines and Regulations and Proposal on Identification and Listing.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(9) 45 FR 12722, February 26, 1980, USEPA, ``Hazardous Waste Management:Overview and Definitions; Generator Regulations; Transporter Regulations.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(10) 45 FR 33140, May 19, 1980, USEPA, ``Standards Applicable to Generatorsof Hazardous Waste.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(11) 45 FR 33150, May 19, 1980, USEPA, ``Standards Applicable to Transportersof Hazardous Waste.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(12) 45 FR 33154, May 19, 1980, USEPA, ``Standards and Interim StatusStandards for Owners and Operators of Hazardous Waste Treatment, Storage,and Disposal Facilities.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(13) 45 FR 33260, May 19, 1980, USEPA, ``Proposal to Modify 40 CFRPart 265_Subpart H_Financial Requirements.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(14) 46 FR 2802, January 12, 1981, USEPA, ``Standards Applicable toOwners and Operators of Hazardous Waste Treatment, Storage, and DisposalFacilities; Consolidated Permit Regulations.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(15) 47 FR 15032, April 7, 1982, USEPA, ``Standards Applicable toOwners and Operators of Hazardous Waste Treatment, Storage, and DisposalFacilities; Financial Requirements.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(16) 49 FR 10490, March 20, 1984, USEPA, ``Hazardous Waste ManagementSystem; General; Standards for Generators of Hazardous Waste; State HazardousWaste Program Requirements.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(17) 51 FR 16422, May 2, 1986, USEPA, ``Standards Applicable to Ownersand Operators of Hazardous Waste Treatment, Storage, and Disposal Facilities;Closure/Post-Closure and Financial Responsibility Requirements.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">C. Support Documents</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) USEPA, OPTS, ETD, Regulatory Impact Analysis of Proposed OptionsFor Notification and Manifesting of PCB-Containing Wastes, Final Report,ICF, Inc., February 22, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) USEPA, OPTS, ETD, Regulatory Flexibility Analysis in Support ofthe Proposed PCB Notification and Manifest Rule, June 22, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) USGAO, February 22, 1985, Report to the Subcommittee on Investigationsand Oversight, House Committee on Public Works and Transportation, ``IllegalDisposal of Hazardous Waste: Difficult to Detect or Deter.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) USGAO, May 20, 1987, Report to the Chairman, Subcommittee on Environment,Energy, and Natural Resources, House Committee on Government Operations,``Toxic Substances; Abandonment of PCBs Demonstrates Need for Program Improvements.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) USGAO, February 26, 1988, Report to the Chairman, Subcommitteeon Environment, Energy, and Natural Resources, House Committee on GovernmentOperations, ``PCB Enforcement in Kansas City Region Substantiates Needfor Further Program Improvements.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) USEPA, Region VII, Testimony of Morris Kay, Regional Administrator,before the Subcommittee on Environment, Energy, and Natural Resources,House Committee on Government Operations, August 13, 1986.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) USEPA, OPTS, Testimony of Dr. John A. Moore, Assistant Administratorfor Pesticides and Toxic Substances, before the Subcommittee on Environment,Energy, and Natural Resources, House Committee on Government Operations,April 6, 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(8) U.S. Congress, House of Representatives, 100th Congress, 1st Session;HR 3070: ``The PCB Regulatory Improvements Act of 1987.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(9) USGAO, Testimony of Mr. Hugh Wessinger, Senior Associate Director,before the Subcommittee on Transportation, Tourism, and Hazardous Materials,House Committee on Energy and Commerce, December 9, 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(10) USEPA, OPTS, Testimony of Dr. John A. Moore, Assistant Administratorfor Pesticides and Toxic Substances, before the Subcommittee on Transportation,Tourism, and Hazardous Materials, House Committee on Energy and Commerce,December 9, 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(11) Ohio EPA, Testimony of G. Richard Carter, before the Subcommitteeon Transportation, Tourism, and Hazardous Materials, House Committee onEnergy and Commerce, December 9, 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(12) Edison Electric Institute, Testimony of Thomas E. Siedhoff, beforethe Subcommittee on Transportation, Tourism, and Hazardous Materials, HouseCommittee on Energy and Commerce, December 9, 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(13) Chemical Manufacturers Association and the National ElectricalManufacturers Association, Joint Statement, before the Subcommittee onTransportation, Tourism, and Hazardous Materials, House Committee on Energyand Commerce, December 9, 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(14) Hazardous Waste Treatment Council, Testimony of Robert A. Mitchell,before the Subcommittee on Transportation, Tourism, and Hazardous Materials,House Committee on Energy and Commerce, December 9, 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(15) Natural Resources Defense Council, Testimony of Jacqueline M.Warren, before the Subcommittee on Transportation, Tourism, and HazardousMaterials, House Committee on Energy and Commerce, December 9, 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(16) Testimony of Francis Brillhart, Mayor of Holden, Missouri, beforethe Subcommittee on Transportation, Tourism, and Hazardous Materials, HouseCommittee on Energy and Commerce, December 9, 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(17) USEPA, OPTS, EED, Final Report on National Evaluation Plan; PCBDisposal Program Evaluations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(18) PCB Consensus Group, Letter to Charles L. Elkins, Director, OTS,USEPA, August 14, 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(19) PCB Consensus Group, Letter to Lee M. Thomas, Administrator,USEPA, June 12, 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(20) Chemical Manufacturers Association, Letter to Marcia E. Williams,Director, OSW, USEPA, from representatives of the Chemical ManufacturersAssociation, the Utility Solid Waste Activities Group, the National ElectricManufacturers Association, the Hazardous Waste Treatment Council, WestinghouseElectric Corp., PPM, Inc., ENSCO, Inc., and the American Paper Institute,April 28, 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(21) Environmental Defense Fund and the Natural Resources DefenseCouncil, Letter to Marcia E. Williams, Director, OSW, USEPA, April 24,1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(22) PCB Consensus Group submission: ``Attachment II; Draft RegulatoryLanguage to Amend the TSCA PCB Disposal Rules,'' August 14, 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(23) ICF Inc., Memo to Ed Coe, ETD, OPTS, USEPA, ``Methodology forDetermining the Number of Hours for a PCB Offsite Commercial Storage Facilityto Prepare a Closure Plan and Financial Assurance Estimate'', February25, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(24) USEPA, OSW, States Which Currently Regulate PCBs Under RCRA,undated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(25) USEPA, EED and EDT, Memo to Rulemaking Record, ``Estimate ofCosts to Government Associated with Approving Commercial Storers of PCBWaste,'' August 18, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">VII. Other Regulatory Requirements</ITAG>A. Executive Order 12291Under Executive Order 12291, issued February 17, 1981, EPA must judge whethera rule is a ``major rule'' and therefore, subject to the requirement thata Regulatory Impact Analysis be prepared. EPA has determined that thisproposed rule is not a major rule as the term is defined in section 1(b)of the Executive Order.EPA has concluded that the proposed rule is not ``major'' under the criteriaof section 1(b) because the annual effect of the rule on the economy willbe less than $100 million; it will not cause a major increase in costsor prices for any section of the economy or for any geographic region;and it will not result in any significant adverse effects on competitionor on the ability of the United States enterprises to compete with foreignenterprises in domestic or foreign markets.This proposed rule may in fact result in substantial economic benefitsin the long run. The purpose of the rule is to ensure proper disposal ofPCB wastes. There have been historical cases of improper storage or disposalof PCB wastes which have resulted in the creation of Superfund sites. Becausethe cleanup of these sites is often extremely expensive, this rule hasthe potential to benefit the economy as well as the environment.This proposed rule was submitted to the Office of Management and Budget(OMB) prior to publication as required by the Executive Order.B. Regulatory Flexibility ActSection 603 of the Regulatory Flexibility Act (the Act) (15 U.S.C. 8091et seq. Pub. L. 96-534, September 19, 1980), requires EPA to prepare andmake available for comment a regulatory flexibility analysis in connectionwith rulemaking. The initial regulatory flexibility analysis must describethe impact of the proposed rule on small business entities. If, however,a regulation will not have a significant impact on a substantial numberof small entities, no such analysis is required.EPA lacks information about the universe of PCB generators, storers, transporters,and disposers. This lack of information is a major reason for issuing theproposed rule. Because EPA lacks such knowledge, it could not determinewhether a regulatory flexibility analysis was necessary. EPA performeda regulatory flexibility analysis and used the information which is currentlyavailable.EPA does not have sufficient information to identify all the small businesseswhich would be affected by the rule. Because Congress is currently consideringa bill that would impose requirements similar to those in the regulation,EPA analyzed, to the extent possible, the effects of this proposal andthe effects of the proposed bill.C. Paperwork Reduction ActThe Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 (PRA), 44 U.S.C. 3501 et seq. authorizesthe Director of OMB to review certain information collection requests byFederal agencies. EPA has determined that the recordkeeping and reportingrequirements of this proposed rule constitute a ``collection of information''as defined at 44 U.S.C. 3502(4).The information collection requirements of this proposed rule have beensubmitted for approval to the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) underthe <T3>Paperwork Reduction Act, </T3>44 U.S.C. 3501 <T3>et seq. </T3>An Information Collection Request document has been preparedby EPA (ICR No. 1446) and a copy may be obtained from David DiFiore, InformationPolicy Branch (PM-223), Environmental Protection Agency, 401 M St., SW.,Washington, DC 20460. A copy may also be obtained by calling (202) 382-2744.The public reporting burden for this collection of information is estimatedto average 1.5 hours per response for the notification requirements, 3hours per response for the Exception and Discrepancy Reporting requirements,and 325 to 460 hours per response for the financial assurance and closurerequirements. These estimates include time for reviewing instructions,searching existing data sources, gathering and maintaining the needed data,and completing and reviewing the collection of information.Comments regarding the burden estimate or any other aspect of this collectionof information, including suggestions for reducing this burden, shouldbe submitted to the Chief, Information Policy Branch (PM-223), EnvironmentalProtection Agency, 401 M St., SW., Washington, DC, 20460. These commentsshould also be submitted to the Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs,Office of Management and Budget, Washington, DC 20503, marked ATTENTION:Desk Officer for EPA. The final rule will respond to any OMB or publiccomments on the information collection requirements contained in this proposal.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 40 CFR Part 761</ITAG>Environmental protection, Hazardous materials, Labeling, Polychlorinatedbiphenyls, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: September 13, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Lee M. Thomas,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator.</ITAG>Therefore, it is proposed that 40 CFR Part 761 be amended as follows:1. The authority citation for Part 761 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>15 U.S.C. 2605, 2607, 2611, 2614, and 2616.</ITAG>2. In andSection; 761.3 by adding and alphabetically inserting definitionsfor ``certification,'' ``commercial storer of PCB waste,'' ``designatedfacility,'' disposer of PCB waste,'' ``EPA identification number,'' ``generatorof PCB waste,'' ``manifest,'' ``off-site,'' ``PCB waste,'' ``transfer facility,''and ``transporter of PCB waste'' to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 761.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Certification'' means a written statement regarding a specific fact orrepresentation that contains the following language:<ITAG tagnum="21">Under the civil and criminal penalties of law for the making or submissionof false or fraudulent statements or representations (18 U.S.C. 1001),I certify that the information contained in or accompanying this documentis true, accurate, and complete. As to the (those) identified section(s)of this document for which I cannot personally verify its (their) truthand accuracy, I certify as the company official having supervisory responsibilityfor the persons who, acting under my direct instructions, made the verificationthat this information is true, accurate, and complete.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Commercial storer of PCB waste'' means the owner or operator of a facilitywhich is subject to the PCB storage facility standards of andSection; 761.65(b),and which engages in storage activities involving PCB wastes generatedor owned by others. The receipt of a fee or other compensation for storageservices is not necessary to qualify as a commercial storer of PCB waste;it is sufficient under this definition that the facility stores PCB wastesgenerated or owned by others.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Designated facility'' means the off-site disposer or commercial storerof PCB waste designated on the manifest as the facility that will receivea manifested shipment of PCB waste.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Disposer of PCB waste'' means any person who owns or operates a facilityapproved by EPA for the disposal of PCB wastes which are regulated fordisposal under the requirements of Subpart D of this part.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``EPA identification number'' means the number assigned to a facility byEPA upon notification under andSection; 761.205.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Generator of PCB waste'' means any person whose act or process producesPCBs that are regulated for disposal under Subpart D of this part, or whoseact first causes a PCB material to become subject to Subpart D disposalrequirements. Unless another provision of this part specifically requiresa site-specific meaning, ``generator of PCB waste'' includes all of thesites of PCB waste generation owned or operated by the person who generatesPCB waste.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Manifest'' means the shipping document EPA form 8700-22 and any continuationsheet attached to EPA form 8700-2, originated and signed by the generatorof PCB waste in accordance with the instructions included with the formand Subpart K of this Part.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Off-site,'' means, when used to refer to an activity involving the handlingof PCB waste, an activity conducted at a site other than the site wherethe PCB waste was generated.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``PCB waste'' means those PCBs and PCB Items that are subject to the disposalrequirements of Subpart D of this part.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Transfer facility'' means any transportation related facility includingloading docks, parking areas, storage areas, and other similar areas whereshipments of PCB waste are held during the normal course of transportation.Transport vehicles are not transfer facilities under this definition, unlessthey are used for the storage of PCB wastes, rather than for actual transportactivities. Storage areas for PCB wastes at transfer facilities are subjectto the storage facility standards of andSection; 761.65, but they are exemptfrom the approval requirements of andSection; 761.65(d), unless they storethe same PCB wastes for more than 10 consecutive days.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Transporter of PCB waste'' means, for the purposes of Subpart J of thispart, any person engaged in the off-site transportation of regulated PCBwaste by air, rail, highway, or water.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>3. In andSection; 761.65 by adding paragraphs (d), (e), (f), (g), and (h)to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 761.65</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Storage for disposal.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(d) <T3>Approval of commercial storers of PCB wastes</T3>. (1) All commercialstorers of PCB waste, as defined in andSection; 761.3, shall have interimapproval to operate commercial facilities for the storage of PCB wastesuntil [insert date 180 days after effective date of the final rule]. Commercialstorers of PCB waste are prohibited from storing any PCB wastes at theirfacilities after [insert date 180 days after effective date of the finalrule] unless they have submitted by [insert date 180 days after effectivedate of the final rule] a complete application for a final storage approvalunder paragraph (d)(2) of this section. The period of interim approvalshall be extended to include the period during which EPA considers an applcationsubmitted in accordance with this paragraph.(2) The Regional Administrator for the region in which the storage facilityis located shall grant a written, final approval to engage in the commercialstorage of PCB wastes upon a determination by the Regional Administratorthat:(i) The principals and key employees responsible for the establishmentor operation of the commercial storage facility are qualified to engagein the business of commercial storage of PCB wastes.(ii) The facility possesses the capacity to handle the quantities of PCBwastes which the owner or operator of the facility has estimated will bethe maximum quantities of PCB waste that will be handled at any one timeat the facility.(iii) The owner or operator of the facility has certified compliance withthe storage facility standards in paragraph (b) of this section.(iv) The owner or operator has developed a written closure plan for thefacility that is deemed acceptable by the Regional Administrator underthe closure plan standards of paragraph (e) of this section.(v) The owner or operator has included in the application for final approvala demonstration of financial responsibility for closure that meets thefinancial responsibility standards of paragraph (g) of this section.(3) <T3>Application</T3>. Applicants for final storage approvals shall submita written application that includes any relevant information bearing uponthe qualifications of the facility's principals and key employees to engagein the business of commercial storage of PCB wastes. This information shallinclude, but is not limited to:(i) The identification of the principals or key employees who are or willbe responsible for the operation of the facility.(ii) Information concerning the principals' or key employees' technicalqualifications and experience in handling PCB wastes or other wastes.(iii) Information concerning any past State and Federal environmental violationsinvolving the same business or another business with which the principalsor key employees were affiliated.(iv) A list of all companies currently owned or operated in the past bythe principals or key employees.(v) The owner's or operator's estimate of maximum PCB waste quantitiesto be handled at the facility.(vi) A written statement certifying compliance with paragraph (b) of thissection and containing a certification as defined in andSection; 761.3.(vii) A written closure plan for the facility, as described in paragraph(e) of this section.(viii) The current closure cost estimate for the facility, as describedin paragraph (f) of this section.(ix) A demonstration of financial responsibility to close the facility,as described in paragraph (g) of this section.(4) The written approval issued by the Regional Administrator shall include:(i) The determination required under paragraph (d)(2) of this section,including a statement of the basis for the determination.(ii) A condition incorporating the closure plan submitted by the facilityowner or operator and approved by the Regional Administrator.(iii) A condition imposing a maximum rated PCB storage capacity which thefacility shall not exceed during its PCB waste storage operations. Themaximum rated storage capacity imposed under this condition shall not begreater than the estimated maximum inventory of PCB wastes included inthe owner's or operator's application for a final approval.(iv) Such other conditions as deemed necessary by the Regional Administratorto ensure that the operations of the PCB storage facility will not posean unreasonable risk of injury to health or the environment.(5) Storage areas at transfer facilities are exempt from the requirementto obtain final approvals under this paragraph, unless the same PCB wastesare stored at these facilities for greater than 10 consecutive days.(e) <T3>Closure</T3>. (1) A commercial storer of PCB waste, as defined in andSection;761.3, must have a written closure plan that identifies the steps thatthe owner or operator of the facility must take to close its PCB wastestorage facility in a manner that eliminates the potential for post-closurereleases of PCBs to the environment which may present an unreasonable risk.An acceptable closure plan must include, at a minimum.(i) A description of how the PCB storage areas of the facility will beclosed in a manner that eliminates the potential for post-closure releasesof PCBs to the environment.(ii) An identification of the maximum extent of storage operations thatwill remain unclosed during the active life of the facility, includingan identification of the extent of PCB storage operations at the facilityrelative to other wastes that will be handled at the facility.(iii) An estimate of the maximum inventory of PCB wastes that will everbe handled at one time at the facility over its active life, and a detaileddescription of the methods or arrangements to be used during closure forremoving, transporting, storing, or disposing of the facility's inventoryof PCB wastes, including an identification of any off-site facilities thatwill be used.(iv) A detailed description of the steps needed to remove or decontaminatePCB waste residues and contaminated containment system components, equipment,structures, and soils during closure in accordance with the PCB SpillsCleanup Policy in Subpart G of this Part, including a description of themethods for sampling and testing of surrounding soils, and the criteriafor determining the extent of removal or decontamination.(v) A detailed description of other activities necessary during the closureperiod to ensure that any post-closure releases of PCBs to the environmentwill not present unreasonable risks. This includes activities such as groundwatermonitoring, run-on and run-off control, and facility security. (vi) A schedule for closure of each area of the facility where PCB wastesare stored or handled, including the total time required to close eacharea of PCB waste storage or handling, and the time required for any interveningclosure activities. (vii) An estimate of the expected year of closure of the PCB waste storageareas. (2) A written closure plan found to be acceptable by the Regional Administratorunder this section shall become a condition of any approval granted underparagraph (d) of this section. (3) The commercial storer of PCB waste shall submit a written request tothe Regional Administrator for a modification to its storage approval toamend its closure plan, whenever: (i) Changes in ownership, operating plans, or facility design affect theexisting closure plan. (ii) There is a change in the expected date of closure, if applicable.(iii) In conducting closure activities, unexpected events require a modificationof the approved closure plan. (4) The Regional Administrator may request modifications to the existingclosure plan under the conditions described in paragraph (e)(3) of thissection. (5) Commercial storers of PCB waste shall comply with the following closureschedule: (i) The commercial storer shall notify the Regional Administrator in writingat least 60 days prior to the date on which final closure of its PBC storagefacility is expected to begin. (ii) The date when a commercial storer of PCB waste ``expects to beginclosure'' shall be no later than 30 days after the date on which the storagefacility received its final quantities of PCB waste. For good cause shown,the Regional Administrator may extend the date for commencement of closurefor an additional 30-day period. (iii) Within 90 days after receiving the final quantity of PCB waste forstorage, a commercial storer of PCB waste shall cause all PCB wastes instorage at the facility to be removed from the facility in accordance withthe approved closure plan. For good cause shown, the Regional Administratormay approve a reasonable extension to the period for removal of the PBCwaste. (iv) A commercial storer of PCB waste shall complete closure activitiesin accordance with the approved closure plan and within 180 days afterreceiving the final volume of PCB wastes for storage at the facility. Forgood cause shown, the Regional Administrator may approve a reasonable extensionto the closure period. (6) During the closure period, all contaminated equipment, structures,and soils shall be disposed of in accordance with the disposal requirementsof Subpart D of this part, or, if applicable, decontaminated in accordancewith the PCB Spills Cleanup Policy at Subpart G of this part. When PCBwastes are removed from the facility during closure, the owner or operatorbecomes a generator of PCB waste subject to the generator requirementsof Subpart J of this part. (7) Within 60 days of completion of closure of each facility for the storageof PCB wastes, the commercial storer of PCB wastes shall submit to theRegional Administrator, by registered mail, a ceritification, as definedin andSection; 761.3, that the PCB storage facility has been closed in accordancewith the approved closure plan. The certification shall be signed by theowner or operator and by an independent registered professional engineer.(f) <T3>Closure cost estimate. </T3>(1) A commercial storer of PCB wastes shallhave a detailed estimate, in current dollars, of the cost of closing itsfacility in accordance with its approved closure plan. The closure costestimate shall be in writing, and certified to by the person preparingit, using the certification defined in andSection; 761.3, and shall complywith the following criteria: (i) The closure cost estimate shall equal the cost of final closure atthe point in the PCB storage facility's active life when the extent andmanner of PCB storage operations would make closure the most expensive,as indicated by its closure plan. (ii) The closure cost estimate shall be based on the costs to the owneror operator of hiring a third party to close the facility, and the thirdparty shall not be either a corporate parent or subsidiary of the owneror operator. (iii) The owner or operator shall include in the estimate the current marketcosts for off-site commercial disposal of its maximum estimated inventoryof PCB wastes, except that on-site disposal costs may be used if on-sitedisposal capacity will exist at the facility at all times over the lifeof the PCB storage facility. (iv) The closure cost estimate may not incorporate any salvage value thatmay be realized with the sale of wastes, facility structures or equipment,land, or other assets associated with the facility at the time of closure.(v) The closure cost estimate may not incorporate a zero cost for PCB wastesthat might have economic value.(2) During the active life of the PCB storage facility, the commercialstorer of PCB waste shall adjust the closure cost estimate for inflationwithin 60 days prior to the anniversary date of the establishment of thefinancial instruments used to demonstrate financial responsibility forclosure, except that owners or operators who use the financial test orcorporate guarantee shall adjust their closure cost estimates for inflationwithin 30 days after the close of the storer's fiscal year. The adjustmentmay be made by recalculating the maximum costs of closure in current dollars,or by using an inflation factor derived from the most recent Implicit PriceDeflator for Gross National Product published by the U.S. Department ofCommerce in its <T3>Survey of Current Business. </T3>The Implicit Price Deflator for GrossNational Product is included in a monthly publication titled <T3>Economic Indicators, </T3>which is available from the Superintendentof Documents, Government Printing Office, Washington, DC 20402. The inflationfactor used in the latter method is the result of dividing the latest publishedannual Deflator by the Deflator for the previous year. The adjustment tothe closure cost estimate is then made by multiplying the most recent closurecost estimate by the latest inflation factor.(3) Where the Regional Administrator approves a modification to the facility'sclosure plan, and that modification increases the cost of closure, theowner or operator shall revise the closure cost estimate no later than30 days after the modification is approved. Any such revision shall alsobe adjusted for inflation in accordance with paragraph (f)(2) of this section.(4) The owner or operator of the facility shall keep at the facility duringits operating life the most recent closure cost estimate, including anyadjustments resulting from inflation or from modifications to the closureplan.(g) <T3>Financial assurance for closure. </T3>A commercial storer of PCB wasteshall establish financial assurance for closure of each PCB storage facilitythat it owns or operates. In establishing financial assurance for closure,the commercial storer of PCB waste may choose from the following financialassurance mechanisms:(1) The ``closure trust fund,'' as specified in andSection; 264.143(a) ofthis chapter, except for paragraph (a)(3) of andSection; 264.143. For purposesof this paragraph, the following provisions also apply:(i) Payments into the trust fund shall be made annually by the owner oroperator over the remaining operating life of the facility as estimatedin the closure plan, or over 3 years, whichever period is shorter; thisperiod is hereafter referred to as the ``pay-in period.''(ii) For a new facility, the first payment into the closure trust fundshall be made before the initial receipt of PCB waste for commercial storage.A receipt from the trustee shall be submitted by the owner or operatorto the Regional Administrator before this initial delivery of PCB waste.The first payment shall be at least equal to the current closure cost estimate,except as provided in paragraph (g)(7) of this section for multiple mechanisms,divided by the number of years in the pay-in period. Subsequent paymentsshall be made no later than 30 days after each anniversary date of thefirst payment. The amount of each subsequent payment shall be determinedby subtracting the current value of the trust fund from the current closurecost estimate, and dividing this difference by the number of years remainingin the pay-in period.(iii) If an owner or operator of a facility existing on the effective dateof this paragraph establishes a trust fund to meet the financial assurancerequirements of this paragraph, and the value of the trust fund is lessthan the current closure cost estimate when a final approval is grantedfor the facility, the amount of the current closure cost estimate stillto be paid into the trust fund shall be paid in over the pay-in periodas defined in paragraph (g)(1)(i) of this section. Payments shall continueto be made no later than 30 days after each anniversary date of the firstpayment made into the trust fund. The amount of each payment shall be determinedby subtracting the current value of the trust fund from the current closurecost estimate, and dividing this difference by the number of years remainingin the pay-in period.(iv) The submission of a trust agreement with the wording specified inandSection; 264.151(a)(1) of this chapter, including any reference to hazardouswaste management facilities, shall be deemed to be in compliance with therequirement to submit a trust agreement under this subpart.(2) The ``surety bond guaranteeing payment into a closure trust fund,''as specified in andSection; 264.143(b) of this chapter, including the useof the surety bond instrument specified at andSection; 264.151(b) of thischapter and the standby trust specified at andSection; 264.143(b)(3) of thischapter. The use of the surety bonds, surety bond instruments, and standbytrust agreements specified in andSection;andSection; 264.143(b) and 264.151(b)of this chapter shall be deemed to be in compliance with this Subpart.(3)(i) The ``surety bond guaranteeing performance of closure,'' as specifiedat andSection; 264.143(c) of this chapter, except for paragraph (c)(5) ofandSection; 264.143. The submission and use of the surety bond instrumentspecified at andSection; 264.151(c) of this chapter and the standby trustspecified at andSection; 264.143(c)(3) of this chapter shall be deemed tobe in compliance with the requirements under this Subpart relating to theuse of surety bonds and standby trust funds.(ii) For the purposes of this paragraph, and under the terms of the bond,the surety shall become liable on the bond obligation when the owner oroperator fails to perform as guaranteed by the bond. Following a finaladministrative determination pursuant to section 16 of TSCA that the owneror operator has failed to perform final closure in accordance with theclosure plan and other approval or regulatory requirement when requiredto do so.(4)(i) The ``closure letter of credit'' specified in andSection; 264.143(d)of this chapter, except for paragraph (d)(8) of andSection; 264.143. Thesubmission and use of the letter of credit instrument specified at andSection;264.151(d) of this chapter and the standby trust specified in andSection;264.143(d)(3) of this chapter shall be deemed to be in compliance withthe requirements of this Subpart relating to the use of letters of creditand standby trust funds.(ii) For the purposes of this paragraph, the Regional Administrator maydraw on the letter of credit following a final administrative determinationpursuant to section 16 of TSCA that the owner or operator has failed toperform final closure in accordance with the closure plan and other approvalor regulatory requirement when required to do so.(5) ``Closure insurance,'' as specified in andSection; 264.143(e) of thischapter, utilizing the certificate of insurance for closure specified atandSection; 264.151(e) of this chapter. The use of closure insurance as specifiedin andSection; 264.143(e) of this chapter and the submission and use of thecertificate of insurance specified in andSection; 264.151(e) of this chaptershall be deemed to be in compliance with the requirements of this Subpartrelating to the use of closure insurance.(6) The ``financial test and corporate guarantee for closure,'' as describedin andSection; 264.143(f) of this chapter, including a letter signed by theowner's or operator's chief financial officer as specified at andSection;264.151(f) of this chapter and, if applicable, the written corporate guaranteespecified at andSection; 264.151(h) of this chapter. The use of the financialtest and corporate guarantee specified in andSection; 264.143(f) of thischapter, the submission and use of the letter specified in andSection; 264.151(f)of this chapter, and the submission and use of the written corporate guaranteespecified at andSection; 264.151(h) of this chapter shall be deemed to bein compliance with the requirements of this Subpart relating to the useof financial tests and corporate guarantees.(7) The use of multiple financial mechanisms, as specified in andSection;264.143(g) of this chapter.(h) <T3>Release of owner or operator. </T3>Within 60 days after receiving certificationsfrom the owner or operator and an independent registered professional engineerthat final closure has been completed in accordance with the approved closureplan, the Regional Administrator will notify the owner or operator in writingthat the owner or operator is no longer required by this section to maintainfinancial assurance for final closure of the facility, unless the RegionalAdministrator has reason to believe that final closure has not been inaccordance with the approved closure plan. The Regional Administrator shallprovide the owner or operator a detailed written statement of any suchreason to believe that closure has not been in accordance with the approvedclosure plan.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart J_[Amended]</ITAG>4. By revising the heading for Subpart J to read: ``Subpart J_General Recordsand Reports.''5. By revising paragraphs (a) and (b) of andSection; 761.180 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;761.180</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Records and monitoring.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(a) <T3>PCBs and PCB Items in service or projected for disposal.</T3> BeginningJuly 2, 1978, each owner or operator of a facility, other than a commercialstorer of PCB waste, using or storing at one time at least 45 kilograms(99.4 pounds) of the PCBs contained in PCB Container(s) or one or morePCB Transformers, or 50 or more PCB Large High or Low Voltage Capacitorsshall develop and maintain written records on the disposition of the PCBsand PCB Items. These records shall form the basis for a distinct, writtenannual document prepared for each facility by July 1 covering the previouscalendar (January to December) year. The records and documents shall bemaintained for at least 5 years after the facility ceases using or storingPCBs and PCB Items in the prescribed quantities. The following informationfor each facility shall be included in the written annual document:(1) The name, address, and EPA identification number of the facility coveredby the annual document, and the calendar year covered by the document.(2) For each PCB or PCB Item identified as removed from service:(i) The identity of the PCB or PCB Item including:(A) The serial number or other means of identifying specifically each PCBArticle, PCB Container, PCB Article Container, or other PCB Item.(B) A description of the contents of each PCB Container and PCB ArticleContainer, and the total weight in kilograms of any PCBs and PCB Itemsin each PCB Container and PCB Article Container.(ii) The date removed from service, the date placed into storage for disposal,the date placed into transport for off-site storage or diposal, and, ifavailable from a Certificate of Disposal, the date of disposal.(iii) The name, address, and EPA identification number of the transporterwhich transported PCB waste off-site for storage or disposal, and the name,address, and EPA identification number of the disposal or commercial storerof PCB waste to which the PCB waste was transported.(3) Total quantities of PCBs and PCB Items remaining in service at theend of the calendar year.(4) Total quantities of PCBs or PCB Items removed from service, placedinto storage for disposal, and placed into transpart for off-site storageor disposal during the calendar year.(5) In recording total quantities of PCBs and PCB Items in paragraphs (a)(3)and (4) of this section, the quantities shall be recorded using the followingbreakdown:(i) Total weight in kilograms of any PCBs or PCB Items in PCB Containersand PCB Article Containers, including the identification of container contentssuch as liquids or capacitors.(ii) Total number of PCB Transformers and total weight in kilograms ofany PCBs contained in the transformers.(iii) Total number of PCB Large High or Low Voltage Capacitors.(b) <T3>Disposers and commercial storers of PCB waste.</T3> Each owner or operatorof a facility (including high efficiency boiler operations) used for thecommercial storage or disposal of PCBs and PCB Items shall by July 1, 1979and each July 1 thereafter prepare and maintain a written annual documentthat includes the information required by paragraphs (b)(1) through (4)of this section for PCBs and PCB items that were handled as PCB waste atthe facility during the previous calendar (January to December) year. Theannual document shall be retained at each facility for at least 5 yearsafter the facility is no longer used for the storage or disposal of PCBsand PCB Items except that in the case of chemical waste landfills, theannual document shall be maintained at least 20 years after the chemicalwaste landfill is no longer used for the disposal of PCBs and PCB Items.The documents shall be available at the facility for inspection by authorizedrepresentatives of the Agency. If the facility will cease commercial PCBstorage or disposal operations, the owner or operator of such facilityshall provide at least 60 days advance written notice to the Regional Administratorfor the region in which the facility is located of the date the facilityintends to begin closure. The notice shall also specify where the annualdocuments that are required to be maintained by this paragraph are located.Each annual document shall contain the information described in paragraphs(b)(1) through (4) of this section.(1) The EPA identification number, name, owner, and address of the storageor disposal facility, and the calendar year covered by the document.(2) For each PCB or PCB Item received by the facility for storage or disposal:(i) The identity of the PCB or PCB Item received, including:(A) The serial number or other means of identifying specifically each PCBArticle, PCB Container, or other PCB Item.(B) A description of the contents of each PCB Container, and the weightin kilograms of any PCBs and PCB Items in each PCB Container.(ii) The name, EPA identification number (if any), and address of the owneror operator of the facility from which each PCB or PCB Item was received.(iii) The date received, the date of removal from service, the date disposedof at the facility, or, if applicable, the date transported off-site toanother disposal or storage facility.(iv) The name, address, and EPA identification number of any transporterwho transported PCB waste off-site to another disposal or storage facility,and the name, address, and EPA identification number of the disposal orstorage facility to which the PCB or PCB Item was transported.(3) A summary of the total quantities of PCBs and PCB Items handled atthe facility during the previous calendar year, including totals for eachof the following categories: (i) PCBs or PCB Items received during the year. (ii) PCBs or PCB Items transferred to other facilities during the calendaryear. (iii) PCBs or PCB Items retained at the facility at the end of the year.(4) When summarizing the total quantities of PCBs and PCB Items for purposesof paragraph (b)(3) of this section, the total quantities shall be recordedusing the following breakdown: (i) Total weight in kilograms of PCBs in containers and PCB Items in containers.(ii) Total weight in kilograms of PCBs in PCB Articles. (iii) Total number of PCB Transformers and other PCB Articles, PCB Articlesnot in PCB Containers, and PCB Equipment not in PCB Containers. (5)(i) The owner or operator of a PCB disposal or commercial storage facilityshall submit a copy of the annual document required under paragraph (b)of this section to the Regional Administrator by July 15 of each year,beginning with the first July 15 that occurs after [insert effective dateof final rule]. (ii) An owner or operator of a PCB commercial storage or disposal facilitymay assert a business confidentiality claim covering parts of the annualdocument. In such cases, the owner or operator shall follow the proceduresfor asserting business confidentiality claims described in andSection;704.7of this chapter, including the requirement of andSection;704.7(c) that personsasserting a claim of business confidentiality submit a second copy of theannual document that is complete except that the data claimed to be confidentialhas been deleted. (iii) The requirement to submit annual documents to the Regional Administratorcontinues until the submission of the annual document for the calendaryear during which the facility ceases PCB storage or disposal operations.Storage operations have not ceased until all PCB wastes, including anyPCB wastes generated during closure, have been removed from the facility.(6) Whenever a commercial storer of PCB waste accepts PCBs or PCB Itemsat its storage facility, and transfers the PCB wastes off-site to anotherfacility for storage or disposal, the commercial storer of PCB waste shall:(i) Initiate a manifest under Subpart K of this Part for the transfer ofPCBs or PCB Items to the next storage or disposal facility, and includeon the manifest or continuation sheet, the date(s) of removal from servicefor each PCB or PCB Item. (ii) Include in its annual document (andSection;761.180(b)) records for eachPCB or PCB Item transferred from the facility during the calendar year,the date of removal from service, as indicated on the manifest or continuationsheet that accompanied the PCB waste to the storage facility. (iii) Include in its annual document (andSection;761.180(b)) records foreach PCB or PCB Item transferred to a disposal facility during the calendaryear, the confirmed date of disposal, as indicated by a Certificate ofDisposal. 6. By adding a Subpart K to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart K_PCB Waste Disposal Records and Reports </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">761.202 EPA identification numbers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">761.205 Notification of PCB waste activity. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">761.207 The manifest_general requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">761.208 Use of the manifest. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">761.209 Retention of manifest records. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">761.210 Manifest discrepancies. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">761.211 Unmanifested waste report. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">761.215 Exception reporting by generators of PCB waste. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">761.218 Certificate of Disposal. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart K_PCB Waste Disposal Records and Reports </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;761.202 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">EPA identification numbers. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General</T3>. Any generator, commercial storer, transporter, or disposerof PCB waste who is required to have an EPA identification number underthis Subpart, but has not received one, may obtain one by applying to theAgency using the notification procedures and form described in andSection;761.205.(b) <T3>Prohibitions</T3>. (1)(i) A generator of PCB waste shall not process,store, dispose of, transport, or offer for transportation PCB waste withouthaving received an EPA identification number from the Agency, Generatorsof PCB waste who are exempted from notification under andSection;761.205(c)(1)shall be regarded as having received from the Agency the EPA identificationnumber ``40 CFR PART 761.'' (ii) A generator of PCB waste shall not offer the PCB waste to transporters,disposers or commercial storers of PCB waste who have not received an EPAidentification number. (2)(i) A transporter of PCB waste shall not transport PCB waste withouthaving received an EPA identification number from the Agency. (ii) A transporter of PCB waste shall not deliver PCB waste to transporters,disposers, or commercial storers of PCB waste that have not received anEPA identification number. (3) A commercial storer of PCB waste shall not accept any PCB waste forstorage without having received an EPA identification number from the Agency.(4) A disposer of PCB waste shall not accept any PCB waste for disposalwithout having received an EPA identification number from the Agency. (c) <T3>PCB waste handled prior to effective date of this Subpart</T3>. Generators(other than generators exempt from notification under andSection;761.205(c)(1)),commercial storers, transporters, and disposers of PCB waste who are requiredto have EPA identification numbers under this Subpart, and who were engagedin PCB waste handling activities on or prior to [insert effective dateof the final rule], are not subject to the prohibitions of paragraph (b)of this section if they have applied for an EPA identification number inaccordance with the applicable andSection;761.205 notification procedures.Such persons shall use the EPA identification number ``40 CFR Part 761,''or a number assigned to the persons by the Agency or a state under RCRA,until the Agency issues them a specific identification number under andSection;761.205(a),(b), or (c). (d) <T3>PCB waste first handled after effective date of this Subpart</T3>.Generators (other than generators exempt from notification under andSection;761.205(c)(1)),commercial storers, transporters, and disposers of PCB waste who are requiredto have EPA identification numbers under this Subpart, and who first engagein PCB waste activities after [insert effective date of the final rule],are subject to the prohibitions in paragraph (b) of this section untilthey receive their EPA identification numbers. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;761.205 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notification of PCB waste activity. </ITAG>(a)(1) All commercial storers, transporters, and disposers of PCB wastewho were engatged in PCB waste handling activities on or prior to [inserteffective date of the final rule] must notify the Agency of their PCB wasteactivities by filing EPA Form 7710-53, set out at paragraph (a)(3) of thissection, with the Agency by no later than [insert effective date of thefinal rule]. Upon receiving the notification form, the Agency will assignan EPA identification number to each entity that notifies. (2) All generators (other than generators exempt from notification underandSection;761.205(c)(1)), commercial storers, transporters, and disposersof PCB waste who first engage in PCB waste handling activities after [inserteffective date of the final rule], must notify the Agency of their PCBwaste activities by filing EPA Form 7710-53 with the Agency prior to engagingin PCB waste handling activities. (3) Any person required to notify EPA under this section shall file withthe Administrator the following form, denoted as EPA Form 7710-53. <ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note:</T4> Form 7710-53 is included for the purpose of notice and comment,but it will not physically appear in the final rule. An availability statementfor the form and the descriptive information included in paragraph (a)(4)of this proposed rule will appear in place of the full-text copy of theform and instructions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-M 003 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42">Insert illustration(s) 2 619-621 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-C  </ITAG>(4) The following information shall be provided to EPA on Form 7710-53:(i) The name of the facility. (ii) EPA indentification number, if any, previously issued to the facility.(iii) The facility's mailing address. (iv) Ownership information about the facility. (v) The location of the facility. (vi) The facility's installation contract. (vii) The type of PCB waste activity engaged in at the facility. EPA has determined that the above information is not entitled to be treatedas confidential business information. This information will be disclosedto the public without further notice to the submitter unless the submitterprovides a written justification (submitted with the notification form)which demonstrates extraordinary reasons why the information should beentitled to confidential treatment. (b) Generators (other than those generators exempt from notification underandSection;761.205(c)(1)), commercial storers, transporters, and disposersof PCB waste who have previously notified the Agency or a State of hazardouswaste activities under RCRA shall notify EPA of their PCB waste activitiesunder this part by filing EPA Form 7710-53 with the Agency by no laterthan [insert date 60 days after effective date of the final rule]. Thenotification shall include the EPA indentification number previously issuedby the Agency or the State, and upon receiving the notification, the Agencywill acknowledge the use of the previously issued indentification numberfor PCB waste activities. (c)(1) Generators of PCB waste need not notify the Agency and receive uniqueEPA indentification numbers under this section, unless their PCB wasteactivities are described in paragraph (c)(2) of this section. Generatorsexempted from notifying under this paragraph shall use the generic indentificationnumber ``40 CFR PART 761'' on the manifests, records, and reports whichthey shall prepare under this Subpart, unless they elect to use a uniqueEPA indentification number previously assigned to them under RCRA by theAgency or a State. (2) Generators of PCB waste who use, own, service, or process PCBs or PCBItems shall notify the Agency of their PCB waste activities only if theyown or operate PCB storage facilities subject to andSection;761.65(b) storagerequirements. Such generators shall notify EPA in the following manner:(i) Generators currently storing PCB wastes subject to andSection;761.65(b)storage requirements shall notify EPA by filing EPA Form 7710-53 with theAgency by no later than [insert date 60 days after the effective date ofthe final rule]. (ii) Generators who desire to commence storage of PCB waste after the effectivedate of this Subpart shall notify the Agency and receive an EPA indentificationnumber before they may commence storage of PCBs at their new andSection;761.65(b)facilities. (iii) A separate notification shall be submitted for each PCB storage facilityowned or operated by generators of PCB waste. Upon receiving these notifications,the Agency will assign generators unique EPA identification numbers foreach storage facility notifying under this section. (d) Persons required to notify under this section shall file EPA Form 7710-53with the Agency by mailing the form to the following address: Chief, ChemicalRegulations Branch (TS-798), Office of Toxic Substances, EnvironmentalProtection Agency, 401 M St., SW., Washington, DC 20460. (e) The requirements under this section to notify the Agency and obtainEPA indentification numbers shall in no case excuse compliance by any personwith the 1-year limit on storage prior to disposal under andSection;761.65(a).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;761.207 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">The manifest_general requirements. </ITAG>(a) A Generator who relinquishes control over PCB wastes by transporting,or offering for transport, PCB wastes for commercial off-site storage ofoff-site disposal shall prepare a manifest on EPA Form 8700-22, and ifnecessary, a continuation sheet. The Agency does not maintain suppliesof printed copies of Form 8700-22 for public use, although printed copiesof the manifest may be available from State offices. Camera-ready copiesof the form are available for printing purposes from State offices, andfrom the EPA Regional Offices and EPA Headquarters. (b) A generator shall designate on the manifest one off-site storage ordisposal facility approved under this part for the storage or disposalof the PCBs described on the manifest. (c) If the transporter is unable to deliver the PCB waste to the designateddisposer or commerical storer, the transporter must contact the generatorfor instructions. The generator shall either designate another approveddisposer or commercial storer, or instruct the transporter to return thePCB waste. (d)(1) The manifest which accompanies the PCB waste shall consist of atleast the number of copies which will provide the generator, the initialtransporter, each subsequent transporter, and the owner or operator ofthe designated storage or disposal facility with one legible copy eachfor their records and another legible copy to be returned by the designatedfacility to the generator. (2) The generator shall prepare one additional legible copy of the manifest,to be used as an advance notice from the generator to the facility designatedfor delivery of the shipment of PCB waste, as required under andSection;761.208(a)(2)(i).(e) The requirements of this section do not apply to PCB wastes with PCBconcentrations below 50 ppm, unless the PCB concentration below 50 ppmwas the result of an act of dilution prohibited under andSection;761.1(b),or the result of cleanup of a spill involving material with a PCB concentrationgreater than 50 ppm. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;761.208 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Use of the manifest. </ITAG>(a)(1) The generator of PCB waste shall: (i) Sign the manifest certification by hand. (ii) Obtain the handwritten signature of the initial transporter and dateof acceptance on the manifest.(iii) Retain one copy among its records in accordance with andSection;761.209(a).(iv) Give to the transporter the remaining copies of the manifest thatwill accompany the shipment of PCB waste. (2) Immediately after delivering the PCB waste and manifest to the initialtransporter, the generator shall send to the designated storage or disposalfacility by Registered Mail, Return Receipt Requested, the advance copyof the manifest described in andSection;761.207(e)(2).(3) For bulk shipments of PCB waste within the United States solely bywater, the generator shall send three copies of the manifest dated andsigned in accordance with this section to the owner or operator of thedesignated storage or disposal facility. Copies of the manifest are notrequired for each transporter.(4) For rail shipments of PCB waste within the United States which originateat the site of generation, the generator shall send at least three copiesof the manifest dated and signed in accordance with this section to:(i) The next non-rail transporter, if any.(ii) The designated storage or disposal facility if transported solelyby rail.(b)(1) A transporter shall not accept PCB waste from a generator unlessit is accompanied by a manifest signed by the generator in accordance withparagraph (a)(1) of this section, except that a manifest is not requiredif one of the following conditions exists:(i) The shipment of PCB waste consists solely of wastes with PCB concentrationsbelow 50 ppm, which concentrations were not the result of prohibited dilution,or the result of the cleanup of a spill involving materials with PCB concentrationsgreater than 50 ppm.(ii) The PCB waste is accepted by the transporter for transport only tostorage facility owned or operated by the generator of the PCB waste.(2) Before transporting the PCB waste, the transporter shall sign and datethe manifest acknowledging acceptance of the PCB waste from the generator.The transporter shall return a signed copy to the generator before leavingthe generator's property.(3) The transporter shall ensure that the manifest accompanies the PCBwaste.(4) A transporter who delivers PCB waste to another transporter, or tothe designated commercial storer or disposer of PCB waste, shall:(i) Obtain the date of delivery and handwritten signature of the subsequenttransporter of PCB waste, or of the owner or operator of the designatedstorage or disposal facility on the manifest.(ii) Retain one copy of the manifest in accordance with andSection;761.209(b).(iii) Give the remaining copies of the manifest to the accepting transporterof PCB waste, or to the designated storage or disposal facility.(5) The requirements of paragraphs (b) (3), (4), and (6) of this sectionshall not apply to water (bulk shipment) transporters if:(i) The PCB waste is delivered by water (bulk shipment) to the designatedstorage or disposal facility.(ii) A shipping paper containing all the information required on the manifest(excluding EPA identification number, generator certification, and signatures)accompanies the PCB waste.(iii) The delivering transporter obtains the date of delivery and handwrittensignature of the owner or operator of the designated storage or disposalfacility on either the manifest or the shipping paper.(iv) The person delivering the PCB waste to the initial water (bulk shipment)transporter obtains the date of delivery and signature of the water (bulkshipment) transporter on the manifest and forwards it to the designatedfacility.(v) A copy of the shipping paper or manifest is retained by each water(bulk shipment) transporter in accordance with andSection;761.209(b).(6) For shipments involving rail transportation, the requirements of paragraph(b) (3), (4), and (5) of this section shall not apply. Instead, the requirementsdescribed at andSection;263.20(f) of this title for the rail transportationof hazardous waste apply to such shipments. The rail transporter shallretain one copy of the manifest or rail shipping paper in accordance withandSection;761.209(b).(7) The transporter shall deliver the entire quantity of PCB waste whichhe has accepted from a generator or transporter to either of the followingdesignations:(i) The designated storage or disposal facility listed on the manifest.(ii) The next designated transporter of PCB waste.(8) If the PCB waste cannot be delivered in accordance with paragraph (b)(7)of this section, the transporter shall contact the generator for furtherdirections and shall revise the manifest and/or return the waste accordingto the generator's instructions.(9) No provision of this section shall be construed to affect or limitthe applicability of any requirement applicable to transporters of PCBwaste under regulations issued by the Department of Transportation (DOT)and set forth at 49 CFR 171 <T3>et seq.</T3>(c)(1) If a commercial storage or disposal facility receives an off-siteshipment of PCB waste accompanied by a manifest, the owner or operator,or his agent, shall:(i) Sign and date each copy of the manifest to certify that the PCB wastecovered by the manifest was received.(ii) Note any significant discrepancies in the manifest (as defined inandSection;761.210(a)(1)) on each copy of the manifest.(iii) Immediately give the transporter at least one copy of the signedmanifest.(iv) Within 30 days after the delivery, send a copy of the manifest tothe generator.(v) Retain a copy of each manifest among the facility's records in accordancewith andSection; 761.209(d).(2) If a commercial storage or disposal facility receives, from a railor water (bulk shipment) transporter, PCB waste accompanied by a shippingpaper containing all the information required on the manifest except theEPA identification numbers, generator's certification, and signatures,the owner or operator, or his agent, shall:(i) Sign and date each copy of the manifest or shipping paper, if applicable,to certify that the PCB waste covered by the manifest or shipping paperwas received.(ii) Note any significant discrepancies in the manifest or shipping paper,if applicable, on each copy of the manifest or shipping paper.(iii) Immediately give the rail or water transporter at least one copyof the manifest or shipping paper, if applicable.(iv) Within 30 days after the delivery, send a copy of the signed and datedmanifest to the generator; however, if the manifest has not been receivedwithin 30 days after delivery, the owner or operator shall send a copyof the shipping paper signed and dated to the generator.(v) Retain at the storage or disposal facility a copy of the manifest andshipping paper, if signed in lieu of the manifest, in accordance with andSection;761.209(d).(3) Whenever an off-site shipment of PCB waste is initiated from a storageor disposal facility, the owner or operator of the storage or disposalfacility shall comply with the manifest requirements that apply to generatorsof PCB waste.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 761.209 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Retention of manifest records.</ITAG>(a) A generator shall keep a copy of each manifest signed in accordancewith andSection; 761.208(a)(1) until the generator receives a signed copyfrom the designated storage or disposal facility which received the waste.The copy signed by the commercial storer or disposer shall be retainedfor at least 3 years from the date the waste was accepted by the initialtransporter. A generator subject to andSection; 761.180 annual document requirementsshall retain copies of each manifest for the same records retention periodrequired under andSection; 761.180 for the annual document records.(b)(1) A transporter of PCB waste shall keep a copy of the manifest signedby the generator, transporter, and the next designated transporter, ifapplicable, or the owner or operator of the designated storage or disposalfacility. This copy shall be retained for a period of at least 3 yearsfrom the date the PCB waste was accepted by the initial transporter.(2) For shipments of PCB waste delivered to the designated storage or disposalfacility by water (bulk shipment), each water (bulk shipment) transportershall retain a copy of the shipping paper described in andSection; 761.208(b)(5)(ii)for a period of at least 3 years from the date the PCB waste was acceptedby the initial transporter.(3) For shipments of PCB waste by rail within the United States:(i) The initial rail transporter shall keep a copy of the manifest andthe shipping paper required to accompany the PCB waste for a period ofat least 3 years from the date the PCB waste was accepted by the initialtransporter.(ii) The final rail transporter shall keep a copy of the signed manifest,or the required shipping paper if signed by the designated facility inlieu of the manifest, for a period of at least 3 years from the date thePCB waste was accepted by the initial transporter.(c) The owner or operator of a PCB storage or disposal facility that receivesoff-site shipments of PCB waste shall retain at the facility a copy ofeach manifest or shipping paper that the owner or operator signs in accordancewith andSection; 761.208(c)(1) or andSection; 761.208(c)(2) for the same retentionperiod required under andSection; 761.180(b) for the annual document records.(d) The periods of retention referred to in this section shall be extendedautomatically during the course of any unresolved enforcement action regardingthe regulated activity or as requested by the Agency.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 761.210 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Manifest discrepancies.</ITAG>(a) Manifest discrepancies are differences between the quantity or typeof PCB waste designated on the manifest or shipping paper, and the quantityof type of PCB waste a designated facility actually receives.(1) Significant discrepancies in quantity are:(i) For bulk waste, variations greater than 10 percent in weight.(ii) For batch waste, any variation in piece count, such as a discrepancyof one drum or other PCB Container in a truckload.(2) Significant discrepancies in type of PCB waste are obvious differenceswhich may be discovered by inspection or waste analysis, such as the substitutionof solids for liquids, or the substitution of high concentration PCBs (above500 ppm) with lower concentration materials.(b) Upon discovering a significant discrepancy, the owner or operator ofthe designated storage or disposal facility shall attempt to reconcilethe discrepancy with the waste generator or transporter. If the discrepancyis not resolved within 15 days after receiving the waste, the owner oroperator shall immediately submit to the Regional Administrator for theRegion in which the designated facility is located a letter describingthe discrepancy and attempts to reconcile it, and a copy of the manifestor shipping paper at issue.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 761.211 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Unmanifested waste report.</ITAG>(a) If a PCB storage or disposal facility receives any shipment of PCBwaste from an off-site source without an accompanying manifest or shippingpaper (where required in lieu of a manifest), and any part of the shipmentconsists of PCBs at concentrations of 50 ppm or greater, then the owneror operator of the storage or disposal facility shall prepare and submita single copy of a report to the Regional Administrator for the Regionin which the disposal facility is located within 15 calendar days afterreceiving the waste. The report may be submitted on EPA Form 8700-13B,or by a written letter designated ``Unmanifested Waste Report.'' The reportshall include the following information:(1) The EPA identification number, name, and address of the storage ordisposal facility.(2) The date the storage or disposal facility received the unmanifestedPCB waste.(3) The EPA identification number, name, and address of the generator andtransporter, if available.(4) A description of the type and quantity of the unmanifested PCB wastereceived at the facility.(5) The disposition made of the unmanifested waste by the storage or disposalfacility.(6) A brief explanation of why the waste was unmanifested, if known.(b) [Reserved]<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 761.215 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Exception reporting by generators of PCB waste.</ITAG>(a) A generator of PCB waste who does not receive a copy of the manifestwith the handwritten signature of the owner or operator of the designatedPCB storage or disposal facility within 35 days of the date the waste wasaccepted by the initial transporter shall contact the transporter and/orthe owner or operator of the designated facility to determine the statusof the PCB waste.(b) A generator of PCB waste shall submit an Exception Report to the RegionalAdministrator for the Region in which the generator is located if the generatorhas not received a copy of the manifest with the handwritten signatureto the owner or operator of the designated facility within 45 days of thedate the waste was accepted by the initial transporter. The Exception Reportshall include:(1) A legible copy of the mainfest for which the generator does not haveconfirmation of delivery.(2) A cover letter signed by the generator or an authorized representativeexplaining the efforts taken to locate the PCB waste and the results ofthose efforts.(c)(1) A disposer of PCB waste shall submit a One-year Exception Reportto the Regional Administrator for the Region in which the disposal facilityis located whenever the following occurs:(i) The disposal facility receives PCBs or PCB Items on a date more than9 months from the date the PCBs or PCB Items were removed from services,as indicated on the manifest or continuation sheet; and(ii) Because of contractual commitments or other factors affecting thefacility's disposal capacity, the disposer of PCB waste cannot disposeof the affected PCBs or PCB Items within 1 year of the date of removalfrom service.(2) A generator or commercial storer of PCB waste who manifests PCBs orPCB Items to a disposer of PCB waste shall submit a One-year ExceptionReport to the Regional Administrator for the Region in which the generatoror commercial storer is located whenever the following occurs:(i) The generator or commercial storer transferred the PCBs or PCB Itemsto the disposer of PCB waste on a date less than 9 months from the dateof removal from service of the affected PCBs or PCB Items, as indicatedon the manifest or continuation sheet; and(ii) The generator or commercial storer either has not received within13 months from the date of removal from service a Certificate of Disposalconfirming the disposal of the affected PCBs or PCB Items, or, the generatorreceives a Certificate of Disposal confirming disposal of the affectedPCBs or PCB Items on a date more than 1 year after the date of removalfrom service.(3) The One-year Exception Report shall include:(i) A legible copy of any manifest, Certificate of Disposal, or other writtencommunication relevant to the transfer and disposal of the affected PCBsor PCB Items.(ii) A cover letter signed by the submitter or an authorized representativeexplaining:(A) The date(s) when the PCBs or PCB Items were removed from service.(B) The date(s) when the PCBs or PCB Items were received by the submitterof the report, if applicable.(C) The date(s) when the affected PCBs or PCB Items were transferred toa designated disposal facility. (D) The identify of the transporters, commercial storers, or disposersknown to be involved with the transaction.(E) The reason, if known, for the delay in bringing about the disposalof the affected PCBs or PCB Items within 1 year from the date of removalfrom service. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 761.218</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Certificate of Disposal.</ITAG>(a) For each shipment of PCB waste that is delivered to a PCB disposalfacility accompanied by a manifest, the owner or operator of the disposalfacility shall prepare a Certificate of Disposal, which shall include:(1) The identity of the PCB wastes affected by the Certificate, eitherby specific types and quantities, or by reference to the manifest documentnumber for the shipment. (2) The identity of the disposal facility, by name, address, and EPA identificationnumber. (3) A statement certifying the fact of disposal of the identified wastes,including the date(s) of disposal, and identifying the disposal processused. (4) A certification as defined in andSection; 761.3.(b) The Certificate of Disposal shall be sent to the generator identifiedon the manifest which accompanied the shipment of the PCB wastes within30 days of the date that disposal of the PCB wastes identified on the manifestwas completed. (c) The disposal facility shall keep a copy of each Certificate of Disposalamong the records that it retains under andSection; 761.180(b), for the sameretention period that applies to its annual document records. (d)(1) Generators of PCB wastes shall keep a copy of each Certificate ofDisposal that they receive from disposers of PCB wastes among the recordsthat they retain under andSection; 761.180(a), for the same retention periodthat applies to their annual document records.(2) Commercial storers of PCB wastes shall keep a copy of each Certificateof Disposal that they receive from disposers of PCB wastes among the recordsthat they retain under andSection; 761.180(b), for the same retention periodthat applies to their annual document records.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-21894 Filed 9-23-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-M</ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>